                              427 of 994 DOCUMENTS

                     Copyright (c) 1995 Gonzaga Law Review
                               Gonzaga Law Review

                                  1995 / 1996

                              31 Gonz. L. Rev. 427

LENGTH: 22777 words

COMMENT: Physician Credentialing: Economic Criteria Compete with the Hippocratic
Oath

NAME: Leonard A. Hagen *

BIO:



   * Candidate for J.D., Gonzaga University School of Law, 1996. Chartered
Property Casualty Underwriter, Loma Linda University Medical Center, Risk
Management Department, 1991.

 TEXT:
 [*428]  I. INTRODUCTION


     "Being against managed care [economic credentialing] is like being
     against gravity."  n1


   Health care costs in the United States have tripled from 1980 to 1992, and
were expected to reach $ 1 trillion by the end of 1995.  n2 By the year 2000,
[*429]  health care costs will accelerate to nearly $ 1.7 trillion, accounting
for approximately 18% of the United States gross national product.  n3 The
Office of Technology Assessment ("OTA") categorized health care spending in 1991
as follows: the private sector spent $ 421.8 billion; the federal government
spent $ 222.9 billion; and state and local governments spent $ 107.1 billion.
n4 These impressive numbers have sparked enormous debate surrounding health care
reform -- a reform that is focused not only on issues of access and quality of
care, but also on the efficiency and cost of care. Thus, market pressures are
driving reform efforts and necessitating creative solutions to controlling
health care costs. In its report to Congress, OTA declared "the ability of a
reform approach to control the rate of growth in national health care
expenditures is one of the key issues in the debate over health care reform."
n5

   Physicians control nearly 80% of hospital resources; therefore, much of the
focus surrounding health care efficiency and cost effectiveness centers on
physician utilization practices.  n6 A significant area in analyzing and
monitoring physician utilization is "Cost-Effective Analysis" ("CEA") for
medical treatment,  n7 or what other experts refer to as the "Critical Pathway."
n8 These clinical guidelines are rapidly gaining recognition and acceptance as a
useful utilization tool.  n9 However, the import of economic analysis into the
arena of medical treatment raises decisive points of contention between the
providers of medicine and the purchasers of medicine. Such issues include
measuring treatment in economic units in addition to quality and constraining
medical judgment by limiting the provider's decision-making through the use
[*430]  of defined clinical guidelines. This debate intensifies when deviation
from a guideline triggers an adverse result on the physician's ability to
practice medicine. The process of scrutinizing a physician's practice patterns
through an economic lens (for credentialing purposes) is commonly called "
economic credentialing."  n10

   The recent emergence of economic credentialing is due largely to its use in
managed care organizations ("MCO") that use discounted provider contracts and
efficient utilization of resources to reduce hospital beds by up to 75%.  n11
Most analysts agree that economic incentives impact a physician's clinical
practice.  n12 Thus, even traditional delivery systems such as hospitals are
beginning to use economic criteria in their credentialing process.  n13 This
comment shows that economic credentialing is here to stay, and that if used
correctly, it will play a significant role in controlling the cost and
utilization of resources without lowering the quality of care. This comment
focuses on hospitals and MCOs because hospitals illustrate the traditional
delivery system that presents certain barriers to economic credentialing,
whereas MCOs illustrate the modern delivery system that presents fewer barriers
to economic credentialing.

   II. HISTORICAL BACKGROUND

   A. Quality of Care

   One of the Hippocratic principles still honored by physicians is that it is
immoral to consider third party costs when treating a patient.  n14  [*431]
Traditionally, the quality of care has been the sole focus of credentialing
standards for physicians. Medical practices came under closer scrutiny in the
early 1900s, and in 1917, the American College of Surgeons ("ACS") created
quality of care standards that hospitals complied with on a voluntary basis.
n15 However, by 1946 only ten states had passed laws regulating health care
facilities.  n16 This prompted Congress' response to incorporate the ACS
standards into a model licensure law known as the Hill-Burton Act.  n17

   Under the Hill-Burton Act, states must have licensure laws in effect before
receiving federal funds for constructing hospitals in medically underserved
areas.  n18 Within one year of the Act, every state enacted some form of
licensure for hospitals, addressing the "adoption of medical staff bylaws,
physician appointment procedures, classification of staff membership,
departmentalization, and periodic meetings to review clinical work."  n19
Because each state had different licensure provisions, a need was recognized for
a national organization that could provide guidelines and monitor the quality of
care on a consistent basis. Thus, in 1951, the national supervision of quality
health care was vested in a private non-profit organization called the Joint
Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals ("JCAHO").  n20

   The JCAHO sets forth its standards in the JCAHO Accreditation Manual.  n21
After a thorough review of a facility's physical plant, administration, and the
quality of patient care, the JCAHO awards a hospital with accreditation.  n22 In
1965, the JCAHO's power was significantly increased when legislation
specifically endorsed the JCAHO standards as a  [*432]  prerequisite for
receiving Medicare payments from the federal government.  n23 Thus, while
accreditation is not mandatory, losing it can be financially devastating.  n24
Although the JCAHO requirements address all aspects of hospital treatment and
administration, this comment focuses on section 3 of the JCAHO Manual which
discusses the Governing Board and the Medical Staff.  n25

   B. Cost Containment and Utilization of Resources

   During the last decade there has been a noticeable shift from the paradigm of
the primary physician practicing quality health care with little concern for
costs,  n26 to the primary physician as the gatekeeper of efficient quality
health care.  n27 "The concept that if excellent patient care is provided,
financial matters will take care of themselves is no longer likely to be true
for physicians."  n28 Even the JCAHO, which focuses heavily on quality of care,
has recognized the need for greater efficiency in the utilization of health care
resources.  n29 To a much greater degree, the states, the federal government,
and the judicial system are all beginning to consider economics as a factor in
health care delivery.  n30

    [*433]  1. The JCAHO

   In recent years the JCAHO Manual has made a subtle shift toward encompassing
economic factors. Two examples of this change are the incorporation of Total
Quality Management ("TQM") and performance indicators. TQM is a management
approach, first gaining widespread acceptance in Japan, that focuses not only on
product quality, but also on product efficiency.  n31 The JCAHO Manual expressly
uses TQM as a means of measuring a hospital's performance.  n32 The 1993 JCAHO
Manual states that credentialing for medical staff membership or clinical
privileges may include criteria such as "utilization management . . . risk
management data . . . and other performance-improvement activities."  n33 An
important tool of TQM is the critical pathway, a suggested course of treatment
for a specific diagnosis that will decrease costs by more effective utilization
of resources and generate data not previously available to hospitals.  n34
Following the JCAHO incorporation of TQM, approximately 3,100 hospitals
implemented TQM programs.  n35 Perhaps an even greater change from a
credentialing perspective is the intent of the JCAHO to adopt performance
indicators by 1996, and to create a database allowing hospitals to compare their
overall performance.  n36

   The JCAHO "wields enormous influence over the organization and  [*434]
management of hospitals."  n37 In recognizing this power, it is interesting to
note that physician associations control three of the five organizations that
administer the JCAHO, and during the past four decades the quality of medical
care has been the focal point of credentialing with little attention placed on
the utilization of hospital resources.  n38 However, with the advent of the
1990s came the harsh reality that health care facilities were struggling for
financial survival.  n39 The JCAHO, although certainly not adopting economic
criteria into the credentialing process, has responded with a more fiscally
responsible approach to hospital organization and management.

   2. State Legislation

   States have passed legislation to lower health care costs; and, in fact, some
states have opened the door to economic criteria in the credentialing process.
n40 In an aggressive move toward integration and cost cutting, the State of
Washington passed legislation requiring a study on the integration of quality
assurance and improvement standards.  n41 The legislation states that "quality
assurance and improvement standards are necessary to promote the public
interest, [and] contribute to cost efficiencies."  n42 This study includes such
components as provider and facility credentialing, licensure, staff ratios,
average total costs for length of stay for specific diagnoses, health plan
fiscal performance standards, provider utilization profiles, and utilization
management that monitors both underutilization and overutilization.  n43 Goals
[*435]  of Washington's health care reform include "gains in cost efficiency of
health services [and] improvements in utilization of health services and
equipment."  n44 Washington's health care reform is demonstrative of states'
interest in controlling health care costs.  n45

   Illinois passed legislation adopting an integrated health care system, which
provides in part: "It shall be the public policy of the State to adopt . . . a
health care program that encourages the integration of health care services and
manages the health care of program enrollees while preserving reasonable choice
within a competitive and cost efficient environment."  n46 Illinois also passed
legislation that directly acknowledged economic credentialing.  n47 Although the
Illinois statute cautions against the misuse of economic credentialing, it does
not prohibit its use in the credentialing process.  n48

   Florida opened the door to economic credentialing by including the phrase "or
such other criteria as the governing board deems necessary" in its hospital
licensing statute.  n49 In 1992, a Florida court used this phrase to justify a
medical center's use of financial criteria to deny staff privileges to an
otherwise qualified physician.  n50 Likewise, California legislation instructs
governing boards to "provide for the control and use of the physical and
financial resources of the hospital."  n51 These are only a few of the states
actively seeking new and innovative measures to contain rapidly rising health
care costs.

   3. Federal Government Legislation

   The federal government also has a history of implementing cost control
measures. In 1965, the government created the Medicare program in response
[*436]  to a perceived need to ensure health care for the elderly.  n52 The
following year, Medicaid was created to ensure health care for the poor.  n53 In
1983, the federal government implemented a fixed payment schedule for medicare
patients based upon diagnostic related groups ("DRG").  n54 The DRG program has
been labeled by some commentators as a mega event in hospital administration.
n55 While the underlying purpose of DRGs was to cut health care expenditures by
restricting hospital reimbursement to a predetermined amount, a more subtle
expectation was that a hospital would in turn apply institutional control over
its attending physicians.  n56

   In 1986, the government, still concerned with escalating health care costs,
declared that medical malpractice and "the need to improve the quality of
medical care have become nationwide problems that warrant greater efforts than
those that can be undertaken by any individual State."  n57 In 1993, President
Clinton submitted his proposal advocating a national health care system based
upon managed care concepts of integration and competition.  n58

   The federal government is continually reviewing various methods of reducing
health care costs. In its report to Congress, OTA outlined several ongoing
studies under the heading of "federal cost-effectiveness activities."  n59 One
remarkable statement in the report declares: "HCFA [Health Care Finance
Administration] has long contemplated establishing regulations that would permit
it to use cost-effectiveness as a criteria more explicitly in decisions
regarding coverage. . . . Agency anxiety about the reception of the regulations,
however, has delayed their being made final."  n60 With the escalation of health
care costs, the political climate is ripening for  [*437]  HCFA to implement
some of these controversial measures, many of which are based upon managed care
concepts.  n61

   A recent development was the August 14, 1995 publication of Congress' Stark
II anti-referral legislation.  n62 This legislation was passed in order to
broaden the physician referral prohibition in Stark I of referring Medicare
patients to entities in which they, or their immediate family, have a financial
interest.  n63 In passing this legislation, Congress has sent a strong and clear
message that overutilization of resources will not be tolerated.

   C. Doctor-Patient Relationship

   Another development pollinating the climate for economic credentialing is the
changing physician-patient relationship. Traditionally, physicians would
contract independently with hospitals for the use of a facility to treat their
patients. Thus, physicians were classic independent contractors. However, with
the advent of new health care delivery systems such as Health Care Maintenance
Organizations ("HMO") and Physician Hospital Organizations ("PHO"), physicians
are increasingly hired as employees.  n64 Hospitals are also hiring their own
physicians under exclusive contracts in departments such as pathology,
radiology, anesthesia and emergency.  n65 Some of the fundamental issues in the
doctor-patient relationship are also being re-examined by the courts.  n66 The
significance of this changing physician-institution relationship to the
physician-patient relationship is that employers have more control over their
employees than over independent  [*438]  contractors.  n67 Thus, an institution
may find it easier to restrict the undesired practices of its own employees than
independent contractors.  n68

   D. Compilation of Utilization Data

   Today, vast amounts of physician utilization data is available due to
technological advances in computer information systems. Because of these
advances, the Health Care Quality Improvement Act,  n69 state statutes,  n70 and
the JCAHO require reporting of utilization data.  n71 These reporting
requirements greatly increase the volume of available data, and many companies
are actively synthesizing this data into meaningful outcome-based information.
n72 One existing barrier to effectively using this data is the difficulty in
making it fair and objective. Research conducted at the direction of OTA
revealed that some of the most common medical problems could be diagnosed using
over 10 billion different pathways.  n73 However, this drawback is not as
ominous as it may first appear. First, many companies have been tracking data
since the mid 1980s, making their data more credible.  n74 Second, advances in
computer technology are occurring so rapidly that the credibility is short
lived.

   With billions of dollars at stake in the health care industry and the visible
advances in computer technology, data information will continue to expand and
respond to the demands of providing data that is flexible and sensitive to
[*439]  patient disparities. In fact, there are currently hundreds of practice
guidelines (critical pathways) and software programs available for all forms of
health care purchasers.  n75 "Medicine has witnessed the development and
introduction of medical practice guidelines . . . [which] has developed into a
plethora of diagnostic . . . treatment recommendations from many national
medical organizations."  n76

   The availability of physician utilization data, combined with the increasing
scrutiny of health care resources, has set the stage for the use of economic
credentialing as a cost-containment management tool. However, evaluating
physicians based upon economic criteria, such as utilization of resources, is
not readily accepted.  n77 Physicians, firmly entrenched in quality of care,
n78 rely on the JCAHO's traditional focus on quality rather than cost, the
doctrine of corporate medicine, and tortious interference with the
doctor-patient relationship. On the other hand, institutions firmly committed to
greater efficiency, rely on fierce competition  n79 and judicial and legislative
concerns of rising health care costs to justify economic credentialing.  n80

   III. SETTING THE STAGE

   If used correctly, economic credentialing can significantly impact the
utilization of health care resources without detrimentally affecting the quality
of care. However, it is important to define the credentialing process, economic
credentialing, and the various health care delivery systems discussed in this
comment.  n81

    [*440]  A. Physician Credentialing

   The medical staff screens physicians through a credentialing process to
determine which physicians should be granted medical privileges at the facility.
Physician credentialing began as a simple mandate to trustees of both private
and public hospitals to "select physicians suitable for practice."  n82 However,
during the 20th century, credentialing has developed into a much more complex
and meaningful process.  n83

   The JCAHO Manual expressly requires that there be a "single organized medical
staff that has overall responsibility for the quality of professional services
provided by individuals with clinical privileges, as well as the responsibility
of accounting therefor to the governing body."  n84 The Medical Staff Executive
Committee's credentialing duties include the process of credentialing, making
recommendations for medical staff membership and clinical privileges to the
governing board, developing termination policies, and establishing ongoing
"performance-improvement activities."  n85 Four core criteria for membership and
clinical privileges that JCAHO requires are "current licensure, relevant
training and/or experience, current competence, and health status."  n86 Most
states, as well as HCFA, follow the JCAHO model.  n87

   B. Clinical Practice Guidelines

   A clinical practice guideline ("CPG") can be defined as "systematically
developed statements to assist practitioner and patient decisions about
appropriate health care for specific clinical circumstances."  n88 Over 1,500
such guidelines currently exist with diverse applications.  n89 Once an
institution incorporates CPGs, the question becomes: How will the guidelines
[*441]  impact clinical practice? OTA describes passive and active
dissemination, two broad approaches to changing clinical practice patterns.  n90

   The passive approach simply disseminates information, whereas the active
approach applies economic incentives.  n91 As evidence of its economic theory,
OTA cites studies which show higher utilization for services such as radiation
therapy, physical rehabilitation, and diagnostic imaging in physician-owned
facilities than in non-physician facilities.  n92 Some health care purchasers
have taken the active approach a step further by implementing negative or
adverse outcomes in order to change clinical practices. Under this approach, a
physician may be denied staff privileges or the opportunity to participate in a
managed care system because of overutilization as measured against CPGs or other
data measured for clinical efficiency.

   C. Economic Credentialing

   Traditional credentialing is the process by which an institution reviews
information such as education, experience, personal references and adequate
limits of malpractice coverage, in order to extend privileges only to competent
physicians. It is now possible to add a physician's utilization patterns to the
credentialing process and measure them against other physicians' practices or
against standardized CPGs. If a provider's utilization of resources falls
outside expected norms, the provider may be labeled under some programs as an
"outlier."  n93 The provider is then barred from practicing medicine at or with
the respective facility. Currently, managed care organizations and large
insurers (as third-party payors) are the main users of economic credentialing.
n94 However, as hospitals struggle to compete with more efficient delivery
systems, they too are beginning to incorporate economic criteria into their
credentialing processes.  n95

    [*442]  No single definition of economic credentialing has achieved general
acceptance.  n96 The American Medical Association's ("AMA") definition stops
short of placing any kind of parameters on what economic credentialing actually
includes: "economic criteria unrelated to quality of care or professional
competency in determining an individual's qualification for initial or
continuing hospital medical staff membership or privileges."  n97 However, this
definition does little to actually define the term.  n98

   A narrower definition of economic credentialing is simply the evaluation of
physicians based solely on measures not directly related to quality of care.
n99 This definition was further clarified in 1992 by the California Medical
Association ("CMA") and the California Association of Hospitals and Health
Systems ("CAHHS") in response to legislation which effectively allowed economic
credentialing. The joint statement, which adeptly includes both of the above
definitions, reads in part:


     CMA and CAHHCS believe that termination or granting of medical staff
     privileges based solely on economic criteria unrelated to clinical
     qualifications, professional responsibilities or quality of care is
     inappropriate, with the exception of statutory, regulatory or judicial
     requirements, such as professional liability insurance, or other
     exceptions which are defined in the medical staff bylaws.  n100


   The use of economic credentialing can be separated into two categories: a
means of generating a profit or acquiring a desired patient mix or an evaluation
of a physician's performance data to select only those demonstrating the desired
level of resource utilization and quality of care.  n101 The latter definition
can be further isolated into two forms: hybrid and pure economic credentialing.
n102 Hybrid economic credentialing is more  [*443]  acceptable because it
attempts to combine quality of care and economic performance. Economic factors
that are often used include malpractice history, hospital admissions, lengths of
stay, resource utilization, and the physician's payor profile.  n103 Pure
economic credentialing, on the other hand, considers only economic performance.
n104

   Because of the enigmas that can arise when the term "economic credentialing"
is defined too narrowly, it is doubtful that either the courts or the
legislatures will attempt to adopt a strict, inclusive definition. Unless
restricted by statutory definitions, the courts are likely to use a broad
definition that allows room for balancing financial concerns with quality of
care concerns.

   D. Managed Care and Capitation

   Before identifying various organizational structures, it is important to
understand the meaning of managed care and capitation. Managed care is defined
by the Health Insurance Association of America ("HIAA") as:


     Those systems that integrate the financing and delivery of appropriate
     health care services to covered individuals by means of: [1]
     arrangements with selected providers to furnish comprehensive set of
     health care services to members; [2] explicit criteria for the
     selection of health care providers; and [3] formal programs for
     ongoing quality assurance and utilization review . . . .  n105


"Arrangements with selected providers" include contractual agreements and
incentives, and discounted fees for service.

   Capitation occurs when a provider agrees to an up-front, flat fee per
enrollee regardless of what the actual care may cost.  n106 Thus, the provider
is placed at risk for costs exceeding the capitated amount. Capitation may or
[*444]  may not be included in managed care contracts. However, it is gaining
popularity both as a cost-cutting tool and as an implicit concept for avoiding
antitrust issues.  n107 Because managed care contracts are discounted, and
capitated payments place the provider at risk, more emphasis is placed on the
utilization of resources. This in turn facilitates the subsequent use of
economic credentialing. HMOs and Preferred Provider Organizations ("PPO") were
among the first to introduce these two concepts; however, they are now
integrated with most delivery systems, as well as traditional indemnity plans.
n108 For the purpose of analyzing economic credentialing, only HMOs and PPOs are
discussed since they adequately represent the network-based managed care
arrangement.

   E. Delivery Systems

   An HMO is a health plan that provides comprehensive health care services to a
voluntary group for a fixed prepaid fee.  n109 HMOs were among the founders of
managed care concepts, and they are cited as the most efficient in terms of cost
effectiveness.  n110 Standard requisites of HMOs include an enrollee co-payment
for services and coverage which is only triggered when using the HMO network.
n111 However, HMOs fell short of their anticipated popularity. Although cost
effective, the rigidity of HMO plans kept them from attracting the expected
number of enrollees.  n112 Thus, PPOs were introduced with the same capitated
(prepaid) fee structures, but they offered more flexibility in physician
selection.

   A PPO is "an entity, consisting of a panel of providers under contract with
the PPO, that contracts with payors for such provider panel to provide medical
services to enrollees on a discounted fee-for-service basis."  n113 PPO provider
panels are closed, meaning providers that are not selected cannot participate in
the PPO plan. PPOs offer administrative functions including  [*445]  plan
coordination, utilization review, and quality review.  n114 Similar to HMO
providers, PPO providers can also be at risk under capitated agreements.

   The traditional hospital has struggled to compete with these more efficient
delivery systems. During the last decade, nearly 700 hospitals have closed their
doors, largely due to MCOs effectively competing with hospitals for patients.
n115 Thus, if hospitals are to survive economically, they must be able to
compete on a level playing field with these networks. With physicians utilizing
nearly 80% of resources,  n116 this playing field must include the ability of
hospitals to implement economic credentialing as a means to control resource
utilization.

   F. Licensure and Insurance Regulations

   The effect that licensure and insurance regulations have on credentialing
decisions depends on what statutes apply. Because states generally regulate both
hospital licensure and insurance, statutes must be reviewed on a state by state
basis.  n117 For example, Washington hospitals are subject to the Hospital
Licensing and Regulation Act.  n118 HMOs are subject to certain provisions of
both hospital licensure and insurance regulations under the Health Maintenance
Organizations Act,  n119 and some MCOs are subject to insurance regulations.
n120 Because HMOs are medical facilities and share in the risk of loss, they are
usually subject to hospital licensure laws as well as insurance regulations.
n121 Likewise, PPOs may be subject to state health insurance regulations if they
qualify as a "risk bearing" structure.  n122

   With this general background of legislative cost-containment mandates and the
different participants in health care delivery, the discussion becomes one of
specific legal issues regarding economic criteria in the credentialing  [*446]
process. Legal barriers that once may have prohibited economic credentialing are
now nonexistent, or at least do not posit the same level of deterrence.

   IV. JUDICIAL ACKNOWLEDGEMENT OF ECONOMIC CONSIDERATIONS

   With ample evidence that economic credentialing is here to stay, the issue
becomes: Once a decision to incorporate economic criteria has been made which
adversely impacts a provider's ability to practice medicine, will the decision
withstand legal challenges? Although no court has directly addressed this
question, a vice president of a utilization review and credentialing service
firm noted that to date a court has not ruled against provider exclusion when
based upon legitimate business reasons.  n123

   Whether economic credentialing will withstand judicial scrutiny is likely to
turn on two factors: first, violations of public policy; and second, connections
with quality of care. This new direction is demonstrated by a culmination of
judicial decisions including closed departments and exclusive contracts,
physician overutilization of resources, and a maturing public policy of fiscal
temperance.  n124 With the exception of the Florida District Court in Rosenblum
v. Tallahassee Memorial Regional Medical Center,  n125 the courts have looked
for some connection to the quality of care when ruling on economic criteria used
in the credentialing process.  n126

   A. Closed Departments and Exclusive Contracts

   Closed departments and exclusive contracts are very similar. A department is
closed when the hospital decides that no other privileges will be granted within
the ambit of the department's services. "When a department is 'closed,' a
contract is usually awarded to a specific medical group to run that department.
Radiology, anesthesiology, pathology and emergency services are often provided
by 'hospital-based physicians' who  [*447]  hold an exclusive contract . . . ."
n127 Courts upholding closed departments appear to emphasize that a hospital has
the right to exercise reasonable administrative control over its departments,
including economic considerations that relate in some way to quality of care.
n128

   In Dattilo v. Tucson General Hospital, the court stated that exclusive
contracts enhance the quality of care by improving patient scheduling.  n129 The
court in Redding v. St. Francis Medical Center, stated that the "hospital's
interest in improving patient care . . . outweighed the potential adverse
economic impact on a group of doctors."  n130 Because the judiciary will uphold
closed departments and exclusive contracts if the facility can show an
improvement in patient care, some medical societies are seeking protection from
state legislatures.  n131 This has been met with mixed success since many states
also recognize the need for cost containment as a matter of public policy.  n132
In fact, many jurisdictions are broadening their acceptance of economic criteria
to include the physicians' utilization of hospital resources.

    [*448]  B. Physician Overutilization

   While physician utilization of resources is not economic credentialing per
se, overutilization does have financial ramifications. A number of state courts
have addressed the issue of hospitals denying, revoking, or limiting physician
privileges because of the physician's utilization practices. "In this group of
cases, the hospital's conduct rested, at least in part, on the physician's
exceeding utilization review guidelines that have strong financial implications,
and, as such, have relevance to economic credentialing."  n133

   In Knapp v. Palos Community Hospital, a group of physicians was denied
reappointment of privileges because the physicians overutilized hospital
resources.  n134 The quality review process revealed that some of the
physicians' practices were well below "accepted standards of medical care."
n135 Some of these practices included the excessive use of diagnostic tests and
the inappropriate use of lung scans and medications.  n136 These practices
resulted in overutilization exemplified by "hospitalizations that were 50%
longer and costs that were 31% greater than those of the other staff members."
n137 The physicians' practice patterns were determined to affect the quality of
care. However, the record also points to overutilization costs as a physician
practice problem. Although overutilization costs are not directly cited as a
reason for the denial of reappointments, Knapp implies that cost considerations
will not be judicially disallowed in credentialing decisions if they also affect
the quality of care.  n138

   In the later case of Friedman v. Delaware County Memorial Hospital, the court
upheld the hospital's reappointment denial of the plaintiff because of his
overutilization of bronchoscopic procedures and a refusal to heed
recommendations from the utilization review committee.  n139 An important fact
in that case was that Blue Cross of Greater Philadelphia noted the
overutilization and informed the hospital.  n140 The involvement of Blue Cross
is important from an economic credentialing standpoint because it  [*449]
under-scores an economic concern of the hospital -- that Blue Cross, as an
insurer and third-party payor, will not reimburse for unnecessary procedures.
n141 Again, while overutilization of bronchoscopes embodies quality of care
concerns, it also embodies economic concerns.

   The case of Edelman v. JFK Hospital, while still addressing quality of care,
is closer to economic credentialing than most cases.  n142 In Edelman, the
physician's admissions exceeded acceptable lengths of stay, and he performed
unnecessary diagnostic tests.  n143 As a result of these practices, the hospital
lost an estimated $ 250,000.  n144 It is undisputed that costs were a factor in
the denial of Dr. Edelman's reappointment. However, the decision also rested
upon the effect these practices have on the quality of care.  n145

   C. Furthering Public Policy

   One of the more significant lines of cases touching on economic credentialing
is that addressing public policy. While these cases also involve closed
departments or overutilization, the courts take judicial notice of public policy
concerns. In keeping pace with the demands of society and often with mandates
set forth by state and federal legislation,  n146 the judiciary has developed a
powerful rationalization for allowing hospitals and health care delivery systems
to pursue economic interests that protect the public good.  n147

   In Backlund v. Board of County Commissioners of King County Hospital, the
Supreme Court of Washington upheld the Board's decision to withdraw a
physician's privileges after he refused to purchase medical malpractice
coverage.  n148 The court expressly declared that "hospital [boards] have the
right to take reasonable measures to protect their assets and the patients they
serve. The Board also owes a duty to the hospital's patients . . . regardless of
[*450]  the details of the doctor-hospital relationship."  n149 The court noted
that physicians enter the practice of medicine by choice and must therefore
"face regulation as to their own conduct and their voluntarily imposed personal
limitations cannot override the regulatory schemes which bind others in that
activity."  n150

   Some fundamental concepts from the Backlund decision are analogous and useful
to the issue of economic criteria. First, a hospital board has the authority to
protect hospital assets in ways that are not arbitrary or capricious. Second, a
public hospital's first priority is to its patients. Third, a physician who
loses privileges for failing to correct patterns of overutilization may have a
difficult time overcoming the fact that it was his own conduct that triggered
the hospital's action.

   The decision in Desai v. St. Barnabas Medical Center involves a hospital with
a closed-staff policy that was implemented because of "overcrowding and
over-utilization."  n151 In reviewing this policy, the court immediately
embarked on an analysis of public policy.  n152 The Desai court declared that
[*451]  the:


     State has manifested its pervasive concern . . . over virtually all
     aspects of institutional health care. Strongly supported by
     considerations of current public policy, the Court has come to the
     definitive position that while hospitals have broad discretionary
     powers in managing their affairs, including the selection of medical
     staff, their health-care powers are deeply impressed with a public
     interest and are fiduciary in nature . . . . If a hospital policy
     decision reasonably serves an evident public-health purpose, it will
     be sustained, even though it may have a discriminatory effect . . . .
     [Likewise], when a closed staff-admissions policy is adopted by a
     hospital, it will be upheld if the public-health objective is
     rationally advanced by the hospital's staff admissions policy.  n153


   Some may argue that public good means assuring access to quality health care
with no relationship to cost. However, public good also embraces the new
statutory mandates requiring affordable access to quality health care.  n154
Thus, when reviewing public policy cases, courts must consider statutory
mandates of affordability in determining what is espoused by the concept of the
public good.

   D. Economic Motivation

   While some cases show that quality of care is a matter of public policy, at
least one case upholds a hospital's denial of privileges based solely upon
economic criteria.  n155 In Rosenblum v. Tallahassee Memorial Regional Medical
Center ("TMRMC"), Dr. Rosenblum contracted with Tallahassee Community Hospital
("TCH") to direct its open-heart surgery program.  n156 While still under
contract with TCH, he applied to TMRMC, a competing hospital, for staff
privileges.  n157 The issue regarding Rosenblum's application for privileges
involved his directorship at TCH, rather than his credentials regarding quality
of care. Thus, Dr. Rosenblum bypassed the  [*452]  credentialing committee and
made his request directly to the governing board.  n158 The board was concerned
that Dr. Rosenblum, as director of TCH's open-heart surgery program, would refer
low-risk patients to TCH and high-risk patients to other facilities, including
TMRMC.  n159 The board recognized that in a managed care environment, employers
and third-party payors will move the patient to those facilities with both
quality of care and lower costs. In upholding the decision of TMRMC to deny
medical privileges to Dr. Rosenblum, Judge Hall stated: "Competition between
hospitals, not only in Tallahassee, but apparently on a national scale, is
intense. It is real. It is not imaginary and not pretextual."  n160

   Legal experts differ in their analysis of Rosenblum. Some argue the case was
determined on narrow facts, such as Rosenblum applying for appointment rather
than reappointment, and a Florida statute that allowed the governing board to
consider "such other factors as the hospital deems necessary."  n161 However,
Rosenblum can also be interpreted as demonstrating judicial tolerance of
economic credentialing, even to the detriment of the provider, if the court
believes the action is reasonable and serves a public-service objective.

   Access to affordable quality medicine is a public service objective that can
be tailored pursuant to state statutes.  n162 Declarations and legislation of
both the states and the federal government show that reducing health care costs
is an undisputable public policy.  n163 The courts are to administer this
policy, and they are doing so by recognizing that health care institutions have
broad discretion in managing their affairs. A synthesis of these cases reveals
that the proprietary interests of physicians may be preempted by reasonable
institutional efforts to further a public service objective. Under this line of
reasoning, overutilizing resources impacts an institution's ability to offer
affordable health care, and thus violates public policy.  n164

    [*453]  V. STATUTORY AND COMMON LAW ISSUES OF ECONOMIC CREDENTIALING

   Economic credentialing triggers legal issues under both statutory and common
law. Statutory implications include antitrust, fraud, abuse, and peer review
immunity. Common law implications include the corporate medicine doctrine,  n165
tortious interference with the doctor-patient relationship, due process, and any
willing provider statutes.

   A. Statutory Challenges

   1. Antitrust Statutes

   Restrictions on physicians' privileges based upon criteria other than quality
of care are carefully scrutinized for anti-competitive behavior. The threat of
an antitrust action is always present when a physician or any provider feels he
or she is restrained from competing. Thus, while an indepth analysis of
antitrust issues is beyond the scope of this comment, the issues presented
should at least be cursorily addressed. Antitrust is first reviewed in the
context of granting privileges and then within the scope of immunity under the
Health Care Quality Improvement Act.

   a. The Rule of Reason

   Antitrust activity is governed primarily under the Sherman Antitrust Act,
n166 the Clayton Act,  n167 and by the Federal Trade Commission ("FTC").  n168
The Sherman Act prohibits any conspiracy or restraint of trade.  n169 Antitrust
claims fall under two separate standards of review: the per se rule which
presumes certain trade restraints violate antitrust law, and  [*454]  the rule
of reason analysis.  n170 The rule of reason analysis asks whether the alleged
restraint is a reasonable practice. Restraints are unreasonable if they
adversely affect the competition with no redeeming value to the alleged
conspirator.  n171 Factors to be considered include the existence of a
conspiracy based upon a non-legitimate motive and an adverse impact through an
improper trade restraint that affects a particularized market.  n172

   Most medical staff antitrust allegations fall under the rule of reason
analysis because they lack the statutory elements of a per se violation.  n173
Credentialing decisions can fall prey to antitrust under the rule of reason
analysis if a physician is excluded from a panel without a rational reason.
n174 Therefore, to insulate credentialing, the "decision should be based on the
application of standards which have a rational relationship to the venture's
business, on quality of care decisions, and on a reasonable business purpose."
n175

   When economic credentialing is properly administered, there are no inherent
violations of antitrust.  n176 Implementing economic credentialing as a part of
the overall credentialing process is very difficult to defeat in terms of
antitrust challenges. First, the plaintiff would have to rebut the rule of
reason, and second, "legitimate business reasons are valid grounds for [the]
defense of practices that may result in economic injury to certain individuals."
n177 Conserving resources, arguably through economic credentialing, is a
legitimate business reason because it enhances the institution's overall quality
of care by not overallocating resources to some  [*455]  patients, and thus
underallocating resources to other patients.

   Hospitals frequently assert that their credentialing decisions were made
pursuant to a state mandate, and thus are exempt from federal antitrust laws
under the state action doctrine.  n178 In 1980, the United States Supreme Court
responded with a two-part test that a hospital must meet to successfully assert
this defense: one, the conduct was required by a clear state policy; and two,
the state must supervise its policy.  n179 In 1982, the Supreme Court stated
that antitrust laws would be applied less stringently to HMOs and "functionally
integrated group[s] of doctors" if they shared in the risk.  n180 The rationale
for this is that "persons who would otherwise be competitors, pool their capital
and share the risks of loss as well as the opportunities for profit. In such
joint ventures, the partnership is regarded as a single firm competing with
other sellers in the market."  n181 However, antitrust concerns continued to
stymie physician involvement in peer review credentialing decisions, and a few
years later Congress devised its own response.

   b. The Health Care Quality Improvement Act

   In 1986, Congress passed the Health Care Quality Improvement Act ("HCQIA") to
alleviate physicians' antitrust concerns regarding participation in peer review
decisions.  n182 However, to trigger immunity under the HCQIA, the action must
meet the standards set forth in 42 U.S.C. § 11112, including "the reasonable
belief that the action was in the furtherance of quality health care."  n183
There is a presumption of compliance with this standard that can be rebutted
only by a preponderance of the evidence.  n184 In Austin v. McNamara, the court
upheld peer review immunity when a physician's privileges were suspended.  n185

   Hybrid forms of economic credentialing connected with quality of care issues
will receive federal immunity under the HCQIA. Conversely, to the extent the
decision is removed from quality of care, it will probably lose HCQIA immunity.
Pure economic credentialing is such an example. However, it is arguable that
even pure economic credentialing decisions may  [*456]  trigger immunity if the
court believes the decision was made to further a state mandate of affordable
access to care. In this context, one can argue that the decision is indeed tied
to the furtherance of quality health care.  n186 It is also noteworthy that some
states, such as Illinois, trigger their own immunity when peer review actions
fail to trigger federal protection under the HCQIA.  n187

   2. Fraud and Abuse Statutes

   Fraud and abuse statutes, also referred to as anti-kickback statutes,
strictly prohibit a provider from receiving remuneration for referring a patient
under Medicare or Medicaid.  n188 Congress enacted these statutes to restrict
providers from receiving kickbacks (bribes) for referring patients.  n189 Thus,
the issue that could apply in the economic credentialing context is narrow and
applies more to credentialing designed to attract a desired patient mix than for
cost-containment measures. Further, integrated delivery systems that furnish
both the provider and facility for one stop medical care are further protected
from potential violations.  n190 Because credentialing does not focus on
referrals, the likelihood of violating the statutes is remote.

   B. Common Law Challenges

   1. Corporate Medicine Doctrine

   The corporate medicine doctrine prohibits the practice of medicine by anyone
but a licensed physician.  n191 For example, in a purchaser's utilization review
process, an employee often makes the initial determination of the patient's
treatment. One writer described this process as using "non-physician
gatekeepers."  n192 The prevailing concern is that corporations are focused on
the bottom line, which ultimately prevents the patient from receiving care
uninhibited by financial constraints. While the corporate medicine doctrine is
alive and well, it is not universal in its application.

 [*457]  Increasingly, both statutory and common law are beginning to limit its
application in response to the changing health care environment.

   Several states have statutes that prevent the practice of corporate medicine,
n193 some states rely on case law,  n194 and at least two states do not even
recognize the doctrine.  n195 HMOs and similar managed care structures are
largely exempt from the doctrine.  n196 Likewise, the courts also allow
nonprofit organizations to employ physicians.  n197 Most notably, the recent
Health Security Act proposal by the Clinton Administration would have largely
eliminated the doctrine altogether.  n198 Although the Act failed in the House,
it does represent the prevailing view that health care costs are becoming
increasingly important.

   In the context of economic criteria in the credentialing process, decisions
from non-physician (lay) employees of the institution may be deemed the
unlicensed practice of medicine if they restrict or prevent the physician from
rendering patient care. Therefore, to the extent the decision is made by
non-physicians, hospitals may be violating the doctrine by refusing to grant or
reappoint privileges.  n199 Ensuring physician involvement in the process will
mitigate, if not eliminate, the concern. Managed care structures such as PHOs
and independent practice associations ("IPA") consist of physicians, who may act
as corporate representatives because they are licensed, thus circumventing the
doctrine altogether.

   To the extent the corporate medicine doctrine is adhered to, it chills
creative solutions. However, the doctrine has already been significantly muted
by the emergence of managed care systems. Furthermore, to effectuate  [*458]
the recognized need for affordable health care, the corporate medicine doctrine
will continue to decline in application.

   2. Tortious Interference with Doctor-Patient Relationship

   Tortious interference is often confused with the corporate medicine doctrine.
However, the focus of each is quite different. The corporate medicine doctrine
focuses on the physician-patient relationship, whereas tortious interference
focuses on the physician-institution relationship.  n200 Prosser and Keeton
state:


     it may be tortious to interfere with the plaintiff's prospects of
     economic gain . . . [and] liability may be imposed in the case of
     interference with either personal or business relations if the means
     of interference are tortious in themselves, . . . as in the case of
     interference with economic interests through violation of antitrust
     laws, misuse of trade secrets or confidential information and unfair
     competition generally.  n201


Several courts allow tortious interference when a physician is excluded from the
medical staff.  n202 Under this line of cases, even if the institution is simply
following its policies with no intentional interference, liability can be
imposed based simply upon the effect of the institution's action.  n203 However,
there is room for optimism regarding economic credentialing.

   Cases involving tortious interference by the institution generally involve
quality of care issues, not cost.  n204 Furthermore, the interference must be
direct and involve directives that preempt physician authority.  n205 Thus,
policies or treatment guidelines that simply recommend a form of treatment are
not interference.  n206 Economic credentialing, even when in tandem with  [*459]
quality of care, will probably be viewed more as an issue of cost.  n207
Although there is no case on record addressing the issue of economic
credentialing, analogous and related cases show that deference is given to
institutions when the issue centers on cost as a matter of public policy rather
than quality.  n208

   Another line of cases allows institutions to evaluate the treatment
experience of physicians for quality control purposes.  n209 Professor Hall
proposes that this compromise should also apply to institutions evaluating a
physician's utilization for cost control purposes.  n210 Economic credentialing
for initial privileges also seems to escape the scope of interference. While the
tort allows for the expectation of contract, it is difficult for a physician to
prove that he or she was prevented from procuring other agreements or privileges
at other facilities.  n211

   3. Due Process

   a. Constitutional

   The Fourteenth Amendment provides that no state shall "deprive any person of
life, liberty, or property, without due process of law."  n212 A physician has a
property interest in continuing employment and a liberty interest in his or her
professional reputation.  n213 To comply with state and federal due process
provisions, the credentialing process must include the elements of notice,
hearing, and impartial adjudication.  n214 However, the due process challenge is
usually applicable only to public hospitals because of the state action
requirement. Private institutions are not state actors, therefore, they are not
subject to due process claims.  n215 Moreover,  [*460]  credentialing actions of
a private hospital are not subject to judicial review if the decision is within
its bylaws.  n216 While constitutional due process challenges are usually
limited in scope to public facilities, the requirements of due process are
carried over into statutory requirements.  n217

   b. Statutory

   Statutory due process arguably provides greater protection to physicians
because it is not limited to public facilities. For example, the HCQIA requires:
(1) prompt notice of any adverse action against a physician, (2) the reasons for
the action, and (3) the opportunity for a hearing to trigger its peer review
immunity provisions.  n218 The HCQIA applies to both public and private peer
review groups. Thus, credentialing programs should include the procedural
safeguards required under the HCQIA.  n219 A properly designed credentialing
program, complete with adequate notice, hearing, and appeal procedures, will not
only satisfy the HCQIA provisions, but may also shield the institution from
potential antitrust challenges.  n220

   4. Any Willing Provider Laws

   As previously discussed, managed care organizations such as HMOs are usually
not subject to due process violations, unless the adverse action constitutes a
statutory violation. Ironically, these organizations are the front-runners in
using economic criteria in their panel selection (credentialing) process. When
an organization uses criteria to select a limited number of providers, the
result is obvious -- those who do not meet the criteria are excluded. The
disdain for this selective contracting has evoked a powerful  [*461]  response
from the medical community in the form of extensive legislative efforts and
lawsuits.

   a. Legislative Efforts

   The legislative attack centers around "any willing provider" ("AWP") laws.
n221 At the time of this comment's publication, 27 states have enacted AWP laws,
n222 and 10 states successfully defeated AWP laws in 1994.  n223 As denoted by
the title, AWP laws generally ensure that any provider willing to meet the terms
of the contract is entitled to participate as a provider under the plan.  n224
The two competing interests are easily recognized. Providers want to protect
their patient base by not being excluded from the ever-increasing networks, and
the networks want the power to control and supervise costs by independently
selecting their providers. The managed care theory of health care delivery is
centered on physicians as competing economic units.  n225

   Some AWP laws are more far reaching than others. For example, Kentucky passed
legislation, effective July 1995, that allows any provider to participate in the
plan so long as the provider is willing to meet the terms of the contract.  n226
These "AWP laws can have a chilling effect on managed care plans [and]
effectively make managed care entities into indemnity companies."  n227 Other
states, including Nevada and Washington, have  [*462]  passed compromise
legislation that replaces the term any willing provider with the term any
category of provider.  n228 Therefore, the credentialing (selection) process may
not exclude entire categories of providers. However, it may exclude individual
providers who fail to meet the requirements.

   While AWP laws facially appear to adversely impact the use of economic
credentialing, the actual issue is more of a financial challenge than a legal
challenge.  n229 Because AWP laws prohibit selective contracting with providers,
the organization's bargaining position to negotiate lower discounts is reduced
and the additional, sometimes unnecessary, providers increase administrative
expenses.  n230 A 1991 Wyatt Company survey showed that allowing any willing
provider to join a PPO network would increase administrative costs by 34%.  n231

   The legal challenges that AWP laws present to economic credentialing are not
significant, provided the criteria is relevant to the business and connected
with the quality of care. First, the scope of most AWP laws is limited to health
insurers.  n232 Thus, most non-insurers such as hospitals are not affected by
AWP laws, although the line certainly becomes less clear with organizations such
as HMOs that are not de facto insurers. Second, most AWP laws only prevent the
plan from prohibiting the participation of providers who meet the plan's
criteria.  n233 Also, in states that only prohibit the exclusion of categories
of providers, the issue of using economic criteria is mooted even further since
the purpose of credentialing is to select or reject  [*463]  individuals, not
categories. Thus, while properly designed credentialing criteria, applied
equally and consistently, will usually avoid AWP laws, such laws do increase the
cost of health care delivery.

   b. Lawsuits

   Physicians and medical societies are beginning to sue health care purchasers
who deny privileges or selection based upon their utilization history. In one of
the more notable cases, physicians in Washington sued Blue Cross Blue Shield of
the National Capital Area for its use of Pro/File.  n234 In 1994, the Texas
Medical Association sued Prudential for dropping providers in violation of
statutory due process, and the Meridia Euclid Hospital in Ohio sued the
University Hospitals of Cleveland for refusing to refer patients, alleging
interference with an economic relationship.  n235 Because AWP laws vary with
each state, the developing law in this area is best analyzed on a state-by-state
basis.

   VI. STRUCTURE IN PLACE FOR ECONOMIC CREDENTIALING

   A. Hospitals

   A somewhat unusual concept in hospital administration is the separation of
the governing board and the medical staff, due to each having its own bylaws.
Professors Blum and Hall attribute this in large part to the JCAHO guidelines
that many states adopted nearly 40 years ago.  n236 The medical staff provides
physicians with significant institutional power and buttresses their position of
autonomy. This separate physician structure (medical staff) complies with the
doctrine of corporate medicine by placing peer review and credentialing
activities within the medical staff. However, this separation of authority may
also facilitate the implementation of economic criteria into the credentialing
process.

   Two main sources of hospital law are the Health Care Financing Act ("HCFA")
n237 and the JCAHO guidelines (to the extent they are followed by  [*464]  state
statutes).  n238 Under HCFA section 482.12, responsibilities of the governing
board include appointing a chief executive officer to manage the hospital,
implementing an institutional plan and budget, ensuring that services performed
under contract are provided safely and effectively, and supervising and
appointing the medical staff.  n239

   The HCFA requires the medical staff to conduct periodic appraisals of its
members, implement a credentialing process for appointment and reappointment,
make recommendations on such credentialing decisions to the governing board, and
adopt bylaws that meet approval of the governing board.  n240 The JCAHO requires
the same separation of the governing board  [*465]  and the medical staff.  n241
Based upon this separation of hospital powers, there are two approaches to
economic credentialing -- one which implements economic criteria into the
medical staff function of quality health care, and one which implements economic
criteria as part of the governing board function of finance.

   1. Medical Staff

   Economic criteria placed within the medical staff function of quality of care
is a form of hybrid economic credentialing in that it must be related to the
quality of care. However, this requires a solid relationship between the two
boards. Attorneys generally agree that, while the governing board has the
ultimate authority to incorporate economic criteria into the credentialing
process, it is best to reference that fact in the medical staff bylaws by
stating the trustees are responsible for financial oversight.  n242 However, the
governing board cannot unilaterally change the medical staff bylaws to
incorporate economic credentialing. Thus, consent of the medical staff is needed
to amend the bylaws.  n243

   While the medical staff is the best option, it is an unlikely scenario at
least for the immediate future. Of course, it is much easier for new hospitals
to implement economic criteria into the medical staff credentialing process
because the governing board appoints the medical staff. Thus, if economic
credentialing is important to the board, it should candidly discuss and
negotiate its intent to potential medical staff appointees. Incorporating
"hybrid" economic credentialing into the sphere of "quality of care" yields two
significant benefits. First, decisions will receive greater judicial support,
and second, there is a greater likelihood that decisions will receive peer
review immunity under the HCQIA.

    [*466]  2. Governing Board

   Economic criteria placed within the governing board can be totally oriented
towards finance and need not have any relation to quality of care.  n244 It is
easier to implement a separate finance-oriented role of economic credentialing,
independent of the medical staff. "If economic credentialing is seen, not as an
extension of a traditional medical staff quality or utilization review process,
but as a separate, unique analysis, different from medical staff credentialing
review, it may be defended more easily."  n245 This position finds support under
the responsibilities for each board required under both the HCFA and the JCAHO.
The governing board is responsible for the financial and fiduciary obligations
of the hospital, and the medical staff is responsible for ensuring quality of
care.  n246

   Thus, the governing board can utilize economic credentialing as a fiscal tool
of the hospital, instead of as a quality care tool.  n247 Under this approach,
the governing board need only amend its own bylaws and can circumvent the
medical staff entirely. Properly implemented economic criteria under the
governing board is also likely to receive judicial support.  n248 Such support
is even more likely in jurisdictions where the state has legislatively mandated
lowering health costs as a matter of public policy.  n249 While hospitals will
unquestionably implement economic criteria into their credentialing processes,
there are currently few existing programs for review.  n250

    [*467]  B. Managed Care Networks

   Implementation of economic credentialing criteria is easier under various
managed care networks than in hospitals because under managed care networks
physicians do not exercise the amount of control they do in hospitals. First,
the powerful medical staff does not exist in the managed care arena. To
participate in a managed care network, a physician must compete by satisfying
qualifications designed by the institution, not by the medical staff.  n251
Second, managed care networks such as HMOs are usually required to comply with
both hospital licensure laws and state insurance laws.  n252 Insurance laws
focus more on solvency than quality of care.  n253 This allows a greater
departure from the traditional forms of health care that are rooted in physician
control and autonomy. Third, many states are granting statutory relief from
traditional barriers, such as the doctrine of corporate medicine, in order to
promote cost-efficient health care.  n254 In fact, some states are beginning to
adopt integrated systems of health care delivery tailored after the managed care
concept.  n255 The federal government is also promoting managed care through
various tax incentives.  n256 With such wide support, managed care systems are
likely to continue using physician utilization criteria in their provider
selection process.

   VII. QUALITY OF CARE WILL NOT SUFFER FROM ECONOMIC CREDENTIALING

   Opponents of economic credentialing argue that it forces physicians to
practice less medicine, thus adversely impacting the quality of care. One
possible counter to this argument is that less treatment does not necessarily
mean less quality. However, the premise and analysis of such an argument are
beyond the scope of this comment. This comment proposes that the quality of care
will not become substandard because the current health care  [*468]  system has
natural checks and balances that are not supplanted by economic credentialing.
Some of these quality safeguards include JCAHO accreditation, state medical
practice acts and licensing requirements, peer review immunity, negligent
credentialing, and vicarious or entity liability.

   A. The JCAHO and Statutory Guidelines

   The JCAHO is the preeminent regulatory body of hospitals, and many of its
guidelines are incorporated in state statutes and in the HCFA. These guidelines
require a medical staff that is responsible for quality of care.  n257 Hospitals
will not take economic credentialing to the point of credentialing physicians
who could weaken its JCAHO accreditation. Losing accreditation is devastating to
a hospital facility. Because state medical practice acts and licensure laws
require quality of care,  n258 a hospital cannot overlook its quality of care,
and economic credentialing will not change the quality of care mandate to the
medical staff. Another powerful incentive to deter abuse of economic
credentialing is that, to the extent that economic criteria do not apply to
quality of care, immunity for peer review and credentialing decisions is lost
under the HCQIA and most state statutes.  n259

   B. Negligent Supervision and Credentialing

   Vicarious liability for a physician's malpractice is another deterrent that
will prevent economic credentialing from adversely affecting the quality of
care. Under this theory of liability, the "institution is not held liable for
the negligent act that caused harm to the patient, but it is held liable for its
own negligence in permitting the physician to treat the patient."  n260 In the
seminal case of Darling v. Charleston Community Memorial Hospital, the court
clarified that a hospital is vicariously liable for the negligent credentialing
of a physician.  n261 Thus, a hospital is no longer treated independently from
its attending staff; liability extends beyond negligent supervision to the
initial granting of privileges under the credentialing process. This creates a
significant burden on institutions to maintain a thorough credentialing program.
Taking this exposure into consideration,  [*469]  institutions that use economic
credentialing must also be concerned with selecting only quality physicians.

   C. Enterprise Liability

   Enterprise liability is a reactionary response to the increasing popularity
of managed care delivery where the organization takes a more active role in the
practice of medicine.  n262 This theory moves beyond the vicarious liability
standard of Darling  n263 by shifting liability solely to the provider.  n264
Enterprise liability can generally be described as shifting malpractice
liability from the individual provider to the provider organization in health
care structures.  n265 However, liability for intentional acts remains with the
health care provider.  n266

   To the extent enterprise liability materializes, it will certainly chill
potential abuses of economic credentialing. Taking the argument to an extreme,
an organization that goes so far as to select only underutilizers with no regard
to quality of care is exposing itself to massive liability. Because of the deep
pocket theory, the potential liability award of an organization backed by
millions in assets is greater than that of an individual provider who carries
malpractice insurance with limits of $ 1 million to $ 3 million and has limited
assets.

   This increased potential for awards is exemplified in the California case of
Fox v. Health Net.  n267 Health Net denied health insurance coverage for a
breast cancer patient's bone marrow transplant because the procedure was deemed
experimental treatment and was thus excluded under the insurance policy.  n268
The jury returned an $ 89 million verdict for the plaintiff.  n269 The size of
this award demonstrates the increased liability exposure to entities as opposed
to individual practitioners. Therefore, accepting arguendo the  [*470]
criticism that economic credentialing is so fixed on the bottom line that
quality will suffer, the exposure of enterprise liability supports an equally
compelling economic reason for the organization to ensure that the quality of
medicine is maintained.

   For these reasons, economic credentialing will not adversely affect the
quality of care practiced in our health care institutions. Institutions must
comply with quality of care guidelines for accreditation and licensure. Also,
the degree to which economic credentialing affects the quality of medicine is
constrained by liability exposures. Although economic credentialing holds
physicians responsible for their utilization of resources, natural checks in the
system will not allow the quality of care to be detrimentally affected by
economics.

   VIII. A PROPOSAL FOR ECONOMIC CREDENTIALING

   A. Parameters

   In developing an economic credentialing program ("ECP"), it is critical to
evaluate the various computer utilization tracking systems that are available.
n270 The data must be severity sensitive so physicians are not penalized for
treating a patient with severe complications. Tracking systems continue to
improve and are becoming more sophisticated in analyzing different procedures
and taking a multitude of various factors into consideration. Thus, effective
data builds fairness into the ECP by utilizing many factors to effectuate parity
in physician procedures. The ECP may be used to screen prospective physicians
applying for privileges or panel membership. It may also be used to grant,
modify, or deny privileges to physicians seeking reappointment.

   The ECP must address physician behavior as well as cost reduction. While this
comment recognizes the impending need to reduce health care costs, it also
recognizes that many physicians are willing to practice more efficient medicine
and should not be penalized until given a chance to change the undesired
practices. Thus, the ECP should provide physician training and disseminate
information on the plan's expectations. Giving physicians the materials needed
to change undesired practices furthers not only the ECP's goal of utilization
efficiency, but it also adds the element of fairness to physicians.

    [*471]  Finally, the ECP must be aware of the regulations to which it is
subject. The various structures available to health care organizations are
numerous and complex and are subject to potentially different regulations.  n271

   B. Implementation

   1. Hospitals

   An ECP must be implemented for either quality of care or legitimate business
reasons. Courts are willing to acquiesce to an institution's need to improve
such areas as quality, safety, and efficiency.  n272 Ideally, the ECP should be
included in the medical staff credentialing process and should be tied to
quality of care.  n273 This will afford statutory immunity to the credentialing
process. However, the medical staff must agree with the ECP since the governing
board cannot unilaterally amend the medical staff bylaws. Once both sides agree,
both the hospital bylaws and the medical staff bylaws must be amended to ensure
the ECP does not go beyond the scope of authority provided under such bylaws.

   If the medical staff blocks the implementation of an ECP, current law allows
the governing board to circumvent the medical staff by placing the ECP within
the ambit of its own fiduciary responsibilities. Again, the hospital bylaws need
to be amended by the governing board. The main concern with this approach is
that statutory immunity is probably going to fail because the quality of care
element is more difficult to argue when the ECP is not within the medical
staff's obligation to further quality health care. Another concern with the
governing board using an ECP as a fiduciary tool is the alienation of its
medical staff. A major dispute between these two powerful groups can be
devastating to a hospital.

   2. Managed Care Networks

   Implementing an ECP in managed care networks does not create the obstacles
faced by hospitals. First, administration of managed care networks is not
segregated between finance (governing board) and patient care (medical staff),
and a physician wishing to participate in a managed care network must meet the
required criteria or the physician may be excluded. Second, most  [*472]  MCOs
are not faced with statutory or accreditation requirements that restrict
credentialing criteria. In fact, ECPs are at the very heart of managed care
networks. MCOs rely on competitive health care pricing by negotiating price
discounted contracts with providers. The efficiency of MCOs is largely due to
these discounted fees and the efficiency of the providers.

   C. Due Process

   1. Initial Privileges

   Due process (fairness) is always a concern; thus, appropriate safeguards
should be incorporated into the ECP. While private hospitals are usually exempt,
especially when they are within their bylaws, MCOs and public hospitals must be
sensitive to due process issues when integrating an ECP into the credentialing
process for initial privileges. The ECP cannot be arbitrary or capricious in the
way physicians are selected. If it appears that a particular physician is
singled out, there is a due process problem. However, the due process challenge
is nothing new, and the ECP can and should discriminate against undesired
practices. To mitigate due process challenges, the ECP should provide a prompt
explanation of why a particular physician is being denied privileges and
possibly the opportunity for a hearing.  n274

   Because MCOs are currently the predominant users of ECPs, many states have
enacted AWP laws to usurp the MCOs power to select certain physicians to the
exclusion of others.  n275 These AWP laws vary by state, and the ECP must be in
compliance with such laws. For example, Nevada's AWP law disallows
discrimination against the "category of provider," not "a provider."  n276
Therefore, the ECP could not discriminate against a type of provider, such as
certified registered nurse anesthetists. However, individual providers could be
discriminated against based upon undesired practices. An important scope
limitation of AWP laws is that they target insurers, which may include some
health care delivery systems.

   2. Reappointment

   Reappointment raises the due process challenge of continuing employment.
n277 Again, private hospitals find safe harbor within their bylaws. However,
other delivery systems need to ensure that, at a minimum,  [*473]  the ECP
furnishes standard due process protections. The ECP should provide an
administrative process that initially allows the physician to change the
undesired practice. This may involve training programs and private counseling by
those in control of the credentialing process. For those physicians that cannot
or refuse to change the practice, a pre-termination hearing should be granted.

   While a detailed discussion on the various due process procedures that can be
implemented is beyond the scope of this comment, fair notice and a
pre-termination hearing are always important to due process.  n278 Another
factor, similar to antitrust in scope, is the size of the delivery system. If
being denied access to a particular delivery system significantly restricts a
physician's ability to practice medicine, greater due process safeguards
(procedures) must be implemented. However, if a physician's ability to practice
medicine is not significantly restricted, fewer due process safeguards are
necessary.

   D. Monitoring

   To effectively reduce health care costs, the ECP must include an ongoing
process of physician monitoring. The ECP needs to keep pace with medical
practices, advances in technology, consumer demands, and statutory reform
efforts. The ECP must also maintain sufficient data for credentialing decisions
as well as reliable feedback information for continuing education of resource
utilization.

   IX. CONCLUSION

   Economic credentialing is no longer on the horizon. Its potential for
controlling physicians' utilization of resources is well recognized, and it is
here to stay. The fact that physicians utilize up to 80% of health care
resources has not gone undetected, and any attempt to control costs must begin
with the provider. In August 1995, the federal government significantly
broadened the Stark I anti-referral statute in an attempt to further decrease
physician utilization of health care resources.  n279 The private sector has
also responded with a cost-saving tool referred to as economic credentialing.

   Economic credentialing is a means by which to hold providers responsible for
the utilization of resources. Managed care organizations routinely consider
resource utilization in selecting plan providers. Hospitals  [*474]  also
recognize the potential of an ECP to reduce costs.  n280 States recognize the
potential of managed care, and some states have passed legislation that
effectively allows economic criteria to be incorporated into the credentialing
process.  n281 Many states have declared the need for affordable health care a
matter of public policy.  n282 The judiciary is cognizant of these state
mandates in applying the law.  n283 Thus, a well-designed ECP carries with it
the force of public policy. While some statutory and common law impediments to
economic credentialing still exist, they have been largely mooted by the
willingness of both the legislature and the judiciary to examine new and
innovative approaches to controlling health care costs.

   Assertions that economic credentialing will lower the quality of care are
rebuttable by simply analyzing natural safeguards already present in the health
care system. JCAHO accreditation and federal and state statutes are not
supplanted by economic credentialing. Furthermore, legal exposures such as
negligent credentialing and enterprise liability posit a natural barrier to the
misuse of economic credentialing.

   Economic credentialing has a role to play in health care reform and both
purchasers and providers must be aware of its impact on the other party.
Purchasers are struggling to remain economically viable under immense financial
pressure reverberating from reduced government funding, lower third-party
reimbursements, and the continued acceleration of operating costs. Conversely,
providers are facing an overwhelming change in the way they have practiced
medicine throughout this century. Contrary to the Hippocratic Oath,  n284
financial concerns can no longer be disregarded; they must be considered in
conjunction with the quality of care. Standing against economic credentialing is
like standing against gravity.

Legal Topics:

For related research and practice materials, see the following legal topics:
Healthcare LawBusiness Administration & OrganizationAccreditationPublic Health &
Welfare LawHealthcareGeneral OverviewPublic Health & Welfare LawSocial
SecurityMedicareProvidersTypesHospitals

FOOTNOTES:




n1  Don Colburn, Is My Doctor on the List? As Competition Among Health Plans
Intensifies, Some M.D.s are Left Out, WASH. POST, Dec. 14, 1993, at Z10.




n2  Karen A. Butler, R.N., Comment, Health Care Quality Revolution: Legal
Landmines for Hospitals and the Rise of the Critical Pathway, 58 ALB. L. REV.
843, 852 (1995).




n3  OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY ASSESSMENT, U.S. CONGRESS, AN INCONSISTENT PICTURE: A
COMPILATION OF ANALYSES OF ECONOMIC IMPACTS OF COMPETING APPROACHES TO HEALTH
CARE REFORM BY EXPERTS AND STAKEHOLDERS 31 (June 1993) [hereinafter AN
INCONSISTENT PICTURE].




n4  OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY ASSESSMENT, U.S. CONGRESS, UNDERSTANDING ESTIMATES OF
THE IMPACT OF HEALTH CARE REFORM ON THE FEDERAL BUDGET 2 (July 1994)
[hereinafter UNDERSTANDING ESTIMATES].




n5  See AN INCONSISTENT PICTURE, supra note 3, at 31.




n6  See Mark Hall, Institutional Control of Physician Behavior: Legal Barriers
to Health Care Cost Containment, 137 U. PA. L. REV. 431, 434 n.4 (1988) (citing
J. M. Eisenberg, Physician Utilization, 23 MED. CARE 461, 461 (1985) (estimating
control at 90%); J. M. Eisenberg & S. V. Williams, Cost Containment and Changing
Physicians' Practice Behavior, 246 JAMA 2195, 2195 (1981) (estimating control at
50-80%)).




n7  OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY ASSESSMENT, U.S. CONGRESS, IDENTIFYING HEALTH
TECHNOLOGIES THAT WORK: SEARCHING FOR EVIDENCE 107-118 (Sept. 1994) [hereinafter
IDENTIFYING HEALTH TECHNOLOGIES].




n8  See Butler, supra note 2, at 852.




n9  IDENTIFYING HEALTH TECHNOLOGIES, supra note 7, at 111 ("Over 3,000 articles
and letters on the topic were published from 1979 through 1990 alone, of which
nearly 2,000 were analyses of particular interventions.").




n10  See discussion infra part III.C.




n11  Deborah S. Kolb & Judith L. Horowitz, Managing Transition to Capitation,
HEALTHCARE FIN. MGMT., Feb. 1, 1995, at 64 (stating that admitted patient volume
is 0.8 to 1.5 beds per 1,000 enrolled population in a managed care program and 4
beds per 1,000 population in a traditional plan); see also discussion infra part
III.C. "Of the new entrants in the local health insurance market, all are
managed care programs." Bert Caldwell, Jacot to Retire as CEO of Medical
Services Corp., SPOKESMAN-REV., July 19, 1995, at A8.




n12  See IDENTIFYING HEALTH TECHNOLOGIES, supra note 7, at 179.




n13  See, e.g., Donovan Riley, Economic Credentialing Survey of University
Teaching Hospitals, HEALTHCARE FIN. MGMT., Dec. 1 1993, at 42 (noting that
applying economic criteria to appointments or reappointments of physicians to
hospital staffs has become a major issue). A survey in 1989 of 3,400 hospitals
showed 5% passively reviewed physician utilization and cost data; in 1991 a
survey of 500 hospitals showed that 41.7% indicated that in five years hospitals
would use economic indicators in the credentialing process. Id. See also Terese
Hudson, Factoring in the Financials: Court Gives Nod to Economic Credentialing,
HOSP. & HEALTH NETWORKS, Apr. 5, 1993, at 36 (citing a recent Loyola study that
found 60% of chiefs of staff used some form of economic analysis in
credentialing).




n14  R. VEATCH, A THEORY OF MEDICAL ETHICS 158 (1981).




n15  Timothy S. Jost, The Joint Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals:
Private Regulation of Health Care and the Public Interest, 24 B.C. L. REV. 835,
847-48 (1983).




n16  John D. Blum, Economic Credentialing: A New Twist in Hospital Appraisal
Processes, 12 J. LEGAL MED. 427, 432 (1991).




n17  Hospital and Medical Facilities Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-443, 78 Stat.
447 (current version at 42 U.S.C. §§ 291-291o (1988)).




n18  See 42 U.S.C. §§ 291-291o (1988).




n19  Blum, supra note 16, at 432. See also DONALD I. SNOOK, JR., HOSPITALS: WHAT
THEY ARE AND HOW THEY WORK 210 (1981) (reporting that nearly 500 state agencies
regulated health care in 1973); Jane C. Taber & Janna P. King, Caught in the
Crossfire: Economic Credentialing in the Health Care War, 1994 DET. C.L. REV.
1179 (1994) (providing a history of physician credentialing).




n20  Blum, supra note 16, at 432 (The Joint Commission on Accreditation of
Hospitals was subsequently renamed the Joint Commission on Accreditation of
Health Care Organizations.) [hereinafter JCAHO].




n21  THE JOINT COMMISSION ON ACCREDITATION OF HEALTH CARE ORGANIZATIONS,
ACCREDITATION MANUAL FOR HOSPITALS (1995) [hereinafter JCAHO MANUAL].




n22  Id. JCAHO accreditation is also a statement to the informed community that
the hospital is serious about quality patient care. SNOOK, supra note 19, at
208-09.




n23  SNOOK, supra note 19, at 208.




n24  Taber & King, supra note 19, at 1184. The "absence of JCAHO accreditation
will result in a hospital's inability to receive Medicare payments. JCAHO
accreditation . . . is . . . oftentimes a necessary prerequisite to the success
and longevity of a hospital in today's competitive and cost-driven health care
environment." Id.

   The Department of Health and Human Services, Health Care Financing
Administration has determined that JCAHO accreditation is proof of compliance
for purposes of Medicare participation. 42 C.F.R. § 482.22 (1993) [hereinafter
HCFA]. See also 42 C.F.R. § 488.5 (1993) (addressing JCAHO accreditation).
Hospitals must go through the accreditation process every three years; however,
failing JCAHO accreditation results in an annual JCAHO audit until accreditation
is received. Id. § 488.20 (placing an enormous burden on hospitals failing
accreditation).




n25  See JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21, § 3 (providing guidelines and standards
for the medical staff).




n26  See Hall, supra note 6, at 435-36.




n27 " Gatekeeper" is a generic term for a primary care physician who sees the
patient first. The patient is referred to a specialist only if the primary care
physician deems it is necessary. See generally, Jeffrey Glassheim, M.D., Health
Care Reform Already With Us, FRESNO BEE, May 21, 1995, at B7 (discussing the
continuous onslaught of financial restraints placed on physicians).




n28  Melvin A. Block, Presidential Address at the 96th Annual Meeting of the
Western Surgical Ass'n (Nov. 14-16, 1988).




n29  See discussion infra part II.B.1.




n30  See discussion infra parts II.B.2.-3., IV.




n31  See Butler, supra note 2, at 844.

     We are absolutely convinced that TQM is a fundamentally better way to
     conduct business and is necessary for the economic well-being of
     America. TQM results in higher-quality, lower cost products and
     services that respond faster to the needs of the customer. Quality
     results are continually improved through understanding and perfecting
     the systems by which organizations operate.

Butler, supra note 2, at 844 n.6 (citing a letter written in 1991 by American
Express Company, IBM, Proctor and Gamble, Ford, Motorola, and Xerox, to the
academic leaders of America, reprinted in An Open Letter: TQM on the Campus,
HARV. BUS. REV., Nov.-Dec. 94 (1991)).




n32  JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21, at 30 (stating that TQM is a new approach
incorporated into the Manual). See also Joseph V. Truhe, Jr., Quality Assessment
in the '90s: Legal Implications for Hospitals, 26 J. HEALTH & HOSP. L. 171, 172
(1993) (discussing the effect of TQM on the United State health care industry);
Butler, supra note 2, at 844 (providing a detailed analysis of TQM and its
incorporation into JCAHO guidelines).




n33  JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21, at 488.




n34  See Truhe, supra note 32, at 171; Butler, supra note 2, at 844-45.




n35  David Blumenthal, M.D., Total Quality Management and Physicians' Clinical
Decisions, 269 JAMA 2775, 2775 (1993).




n36  JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21, at 459; Elizabeth Gardner, Indicator System
Accepting All Test Pilots, MODERN HEALTHCARE, June 21, 1993, at 32 (discussing
the implementation of the estimated 36 indicators no sooner than 1996).




n37  Butler, supra note 2, at 846.




n38  Hall, supra note 6, at 435 ("For decades, medical treatment has been
dominated by the Hippocratic ideal that all care should be provided that is of
any conceivable benefit, regardless of the cost.").




n39  Fred Jacot, CEO of Medical Services Corp., states: "Hospital costs are far
too high . . . and their clients can no longer pay for excessive capacity."
Caldwell, supra note 11, at A8.




n40  See, e.g., WASH. REV. CODE § 43.72.010 (1993) (improving health care while
reducing costs); KAN. STAT. ANN. § 65-5006 (1992) (allowing cost of health care
as a credentialing criteria); ILL. ANN. STAT. ch. 305, P5/5-16 (Smith-Hurd 1993)
(promoting integrated systems similar to managed care's cost efficient
delivery); FLA. STAT. ANN. § 395.0191(4) (West 1993) (allowing the governing
board to consider "such other factors [in the credentialing process] as the
hospital deems necessary"); CAL. HEALTH & SAFETY ADMIN. CODE § 70701(a)(1)(F)
(West 1991) (allowing governing board to provide for the control and use of the
physical and financial resources of the hospital); N.C. GEN. STAT. § 131e-85
(1994) (allowing the appropriate utilization of hospital facilities).




n41  1995 Wash. Legis. Serv. 267, S.H.B. 1589 (West). This legislation was
passed under a declaration of emergency in order to preserve the public interest
of affordable health care. Id. at New Section 18 (giving the act immediate
effect).




n42  Id. at New Section 3.




n43  Id. at New Section 4 (3)(a)-(j).




n44  Id. (amending WASH. REV. CODE § 43.72.310). Washington's Basic Health Plan
utilizes managed care systems and requires such systems to report utilization of
services in "order to provide adequate information for evaluation" and to strive
towards minimizing costs. WASH. REV. CODE § 70.47.060(12) (1995).




n45  See WASH. REV. CODE § 70.47.060(12) (1995).




n46  ILL. ANN. STAT. ch. 305, P5/5-16 (Smith-Hurd 1993) (emphasis added).




n47  ILL. ANN. STAT. ch. 210, P85.2(3) (Smith-Hurd 1993).




n48  Id.




n49  FLA. STAT. ANN. § 395.0191(4) (West 1993). See also Hudson, supra note 13,
13, at 37.




n50  Rosenblum v. Tallahassee Mem. Reg. Med. Ctr., No. 91-589 (D. Fla. 1992).




n51  Albert E. Trentalance, Economic Credentialing is Here to Stay, PHYSICIAN
EXEC., Sept. 1994, at 38. In an effort to mitigate the potential of this
legislation, the California Medical Association negotiated an agreement with the
California Association of Hospitals and Health Systems that disallows
credentialing criteria not directly related to the quality of care. See
discussion infra part III.C.




n52  Health Insurance for the Aged Act, Pub. L. No. 89-97, tit. I, § 102(a), 79
Stat. 291 (1965) (codified at 42 U.S.C. § 1395 (1988 & Supp. V 1993)).




n53  Social Security Amendments Act of 1965, Pub. L. No. 89-97, tit. I, §
121(a), 79 Stat. 343 (1965) (codified at 42 U.S.C. § 1396 (1988 & Supp. V
1993)).




n54  Social Security Amendments Act of 1983, Pub. L. No. 98-21, § 601, 97 Stat.
65 (1983) (codified at 42 U.S.C. § 1395ww(d) (1988)).




n55  See Hall, supra note 6, at 436.




n56  See Hall, supra note 6, at 440 n.32.




n57  Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 1983, Pub. L. No. 99-660, § 402, 100
Stat. 3784 (1986) (codified at 42 U.S.C. § 11101(1) (1988)) (creating new peer
review standards and granting immunity to those making peer review decisions).
The theory is that limiting the number of lawsuits will lower malpractice
insurance costs which are ultimately charged to the health care purchaser.




n58  H.R. 3600, 103d Cong., 1st Sess. (1993).




n59  IDENTIFYING HEALTH TECHNOLOGIES, supra note 7, at 122-27 (including studies
by the Agency for Health Care Policy and Research, National Institute of Health,
and Centers for Disease Control and Prevention).




n60  IDENTIFYING HEALTH TECHNOLOGIES, supra note 7, at 124-25.




n61 " If you look at most of the health-care reform proposals in Congress, they
do include reliance on managed-care networks in order to contain costs while
assuring quality care." John Lombardo, Doctors May Sue Blues on Ratings, WASH.
BUS. J., June 10, 1994.




n62  60 Fed. Reg. 41923, 41924-25 (1995). See also Andrew B. Wachler et al.,
Stark I Final Regulations: Implications for Health Care Providers and Suppliers,
THE HEALTH LAW. 3 (spec. ed. Aug. 1995) (providing a legal analysis of the new
regulatory amendments to Stark I).




n63  42 U.S.C. § 1395nn (Supp. II 1990). Stark I was initially enacted in
response to a 1989 study conducted by the Office of Inspector General that
showed clinical laboratories in which physicians had an interest performed 45%
more services than other clinical laboratories. Wachler et al., supra note 62,
62, at 3. Overutilization of facilities in which physicians have an interest has
continued in areas not affected by Stark I, thus prompting Stark II legislation
that broadens the scope of the anti-referral statute to include areas such as
physical therapy, occupational therapy services, durable medical equipment and
supplies, and home health services. See 42 U.S.C. § 1395nn(h)(6) (1992 & Supp.
1995); Wachler et al., supra note 62, 62, at 3.




n64  See discussion infra parts III.D., E.




n65  See discussion infra part IV.A.




n66  Pat Beall, Reform kicks up some thorny legal issues, ORLANDO BUS. J., Jan.
21, 1994, at 20.




n67  See W. PAGE KEETON ET AL., PROSSER AND KEETON ON TORTS §§ 70-71 (5th ed.
1984).




n68  Institutional control over physician practices may trigger the doctrine of
corporate medicine. See discussion infra part V.B.1.




n69  42 U.S.C. § 11131 (1988) (requiring reports of medical malpractice
payments); Id. § 11132 (requiring reports of sanctions taken by the board of
medical examiners); Id. § 11133 (requiring reports of certain professional
review actions taken by health care entities).




n70  See, e.g., 1995 Wash. Legis. Serv. 267, S.H.B. 1589 (West) (requiring
hospitals to report data according to set standards designed to improve
administrative efficiency and reduce costs).




n71  See JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21, at 459 (requiring every hospital to report
performance indicators for accreditation purposes, no sooner than 1996).




n72  See IDENTIFYING HEALTH TECHNOLOGIES, supra note 7, at 138. "Entirely new
firms have sprung up as well, capitalizing on the interest in effectiveness
research, cost-effectiveness analysis, and assessments of individual
technologies. An upcoming directory produced by ECRI will list over 200
organizations in the United States and elsewhere that undertake health
technology assessments or related activities." IDENTIFYING HEALTH TECHNOLOGIES,
supra note 7, at 138.




n73  OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY ASSESSMENT, U.S. CONGRESS, DEFENSIVE MEDICINE AND
MEDICAL MALPRACTICE 3 (July 1994).




n74  See discussion infra part III.B.




n75  See generally IDENTIFYING HEALTH TECHNOLOGIES, supra note 7, at 145-59
(describing the development of clinical practice guidelines).




n76  IDENTIFYING HEALTH TECHNOLOGIES, supra note 7, at 139 (The American Medical
Association has also developed its own directory of practice guidelines.).




n77  See generally Hall, supra note 6 (providing a detailed analysis of
physicians' entrenched position of independence and the ability to practice
medicine without institutional procedures promoting cost containment).

   Some medical societies are actively trying to derail the use of economic
credentialing plans. The District of Columbia Medical Society hired a public
relations firm to conduct a campaign against Blue Cross and Blue Shield after
the "Blues" announced a new medical profiling plan to evaluate more than 9,000
local physicians. Lombardo, supra note 61.




n78  See generally Hall, supra note 6 (discussing the evolution and future of
the hospital-physician relationship).




n79  Nearly 700 hospitals closed their doors during the 1980s. John D. Blum,
Hospital-Medical Staff Relations in the Face of Shifting International Business
Strategies: A Legal Analysis, 14 U. PUGET SOUND L. REV. 561, 561 (1991).




n80  See discussion infra parts IV., V.




n81  Employment Retirement Income Security Program ("ERISA") also plays a
complex role in health care law. However, its effect on economic credentialing
is limited to plans that fall under federal preemption, such as employee benefit
plans, and it is beyond the scope of this comment. 29 U.S.C. §§ 1101-1461
(1988).




n82  Blum, supra note 16, at 431.




n83  See generally JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21, § 3 (requiring a thorough
credentialing process); see also infra notes 84-87 and accompanying text.




n84  JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21, § 3 P MS.1 (emphasis added).




n85  JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21, at 465-66.




n86  JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21, at 487.




n87  Blum, supra note 16, at 433.




n88  INSTITUTE OF MEDICINE, CLINICAL PRACTICE GUIDELINES, DIRECTIONS FOR A NEW
PROGRAM 8 (1990). See also John D. Ayres, M.D., J.D., The Use and Abuse of
Medical Practice Guidelines, 15 J. LEGAL MED. 421 (1994) (providing a detailed
analysis of clinical practice guidelines and their various uses).




n89  IDENTIFYING HEALTH TECHNOLOGIES, supra note 7, at 139-40 (citing
applications such as clinical decision-making, education, assessing quality of
care, and allocation of resources).




n90  IDENTIFYING HEALTH TECHNOLOGIES, supra note 7, at 177-78.




n91  IDENTIFYING HEALTH TECHNOLOGIES, supra note 7, at 177-79.




n92  IDENTIFYING HEALTH TECHNOLOGIES, supra note 7, at 179.




n93  D.C. Doctor Group Sues Blues Over Acclaimed Pro/File Profiling System,
MANAGED CARE L. OUTLOOK, July 19, 1994. The Blues' program identified 4,700 of
its 8,000 physicians as practicing cost-effective and quality medicine; these
physicians were invited into a new network, while the other 2,300 were not. R.
A. Zaldivar, Cost Can Count Against Doctors: Hospitals Make Profit an Issue For
Credentials, SEATTLE TIMES, July 2, 1993, at A1.




n94  Hospitals are forced to move more cautiously because physician
credentialing has traditionally been left to physicians -- the medical staff.
See discussion infra part VI.A.1.




n95  See surveys cited supra note 13.




n96  John D. Blum, Economic Considerations Enter the Credentialing Process, THE
QUALITY LETTER, Apr. 1991, at 16.




n97  Riley, supra note 13, at 42.




n98  The AMA is opposed to economic credentialing, and thus has an interest in
keeping the term as broad as possible. See generally Hudson, supra note 13, 13
(noting the AMA's position on economic credentialing).

   AMA spokesperson James Stacey said "the thing we would ask is that . . . pure
economic credentialing not be used." Any Willing Provider Laws a Growing Threat
to Networks, HEALTH ALLIANCE ALERT, May 13, 1994 [hereinafter AWP Laws].




n99  See Blum, supra note 79, at 584.




n100  CALIFORNIA MEDICAL ASSOCIATION & CALIFORNIA ASSOCIATION OF HOSPITALS AND
HEALTH SYSTEMS, JOINT STATEMENT ON ECONOMIC CREDENTIALING AND EXCLUSIVE
CONTRACTING 2 (Jan. 1992) (on file with the Gonzaga Law Review).




n101  See Blum, supra note 79, at part V.




n102  See Taber & King, supra note 19, at 1206.




n103  Taber & King, supra note 19, at 1206.




n104  See generally, John D. Blum, Hospitals, New Medical Practice Guidelines,
CQI, and Potential Liability Outcomes, 36 ST. LOUIS U. L.J. 913 (1992)
(explaining the bottom line approach to pure economic credentialing).




n105  GROUP LIFE & HEALTH INSURANCE, PART C, 222 (3d ed. HIAA, 1992) (emphasis
added) [hereinafter GROUP HEALTH]. The federal government defines managed care
as:

     [A] purchasing strategy to obtain maximum value for money for
     employers and consumers . . . . Managed competition occurs at the
     level of integrated financing and delivery plans, not at the
     individual provider level. Its goal is to divide providers in each
     community into competing economic units and to use market forces to
     motivate them to develop efficient delivery systems.

AN INCONSISTENT PICTURE, supra note 3, at 12 (emphasis added).




n106  GROUP HEALTH, supra note 105, at 35.




n107  See discussion infra part V.A.1.




n108  GROUP HEALTH, supra note 105, at 17-35.




n109  GROUP HEALTH, supra note 105, at 29.




n110  GROUP HEALTH, supra note 105, at 29; see also Michael Daly, Attacking
Defensive Medicine Through the Utilization of Practice Parameters, 16 J. LEGAL
MED. 101, 116 n.142 (1995) (citing a survey revealing "savings of over $ 28 for
every dollar spent after institution of utilization review" (citation omitted)).




n111  GROUP HEALTH, supra note 105, at 28-30 (allowing exceptions for
emergencies).




n112  GROUP HEALTH, supra note 105, at 28-30 (citing problems such as benefits
only being triggered upon the primary care physician's authorization and only
for care within the network).




n113  Rebecca L. Jackson & Karen W. Levy, Innovations in Managed Care, 700 PRAC.
L. INST. 249, § II.D. (1994).




n114  Id.




n115  See Blum, supra note 79, at 561.




n116  See statistics cited supra note 6.




n117  See the McCarren-Ferguson Act, ch. 20, 59 Stat. 33 (1945) (codified as
amended at 15 U.S.C. §§ 1011-15 (1988)) (delegating insurance regulation to the
individual states).




n118  WASH. REV. CODE §§ 70.41.005 - .900 (1995).




n119  WASH. REV. CODE §§ 48.46.010 - .920 (1995).




n120  WASH. REV. CODE §§ 70.47.010 - .901 (1995). MCOs, to the extent they
participate in Washington's Basic Plan, are exempt from the insurance code. Id.
§ 70.47.130.




n121  See, e.g., Jurisdiction of Ins. Comm'r -- Health Benefits Program, Op.
Att'y Gen. No. 90-030 (June 19, 1990) (explaining that capitation agreements for
health care services place the provider in the business of insurance and thus
subject the provider to insurance regulations).




n122  Jackson & Levy, supra note 113, §§ C.1-7.




n123  Plans Can Use Economic Criteria To Lawfully Exclude Physicians, MANAGED
CARE WK., Oct. 31, 1994.




n124  In the cases discussed in this section, the courts do not rule out quality
of care; they simply recognize economics as a rational element of credentialing.




n125  No. 91-589 (D. Fla. 1992).




N126  See, e.g., Holmes v. Hoemako Hosp., 573 P.2d 477, 478 (Ariz. 1977)
(finding that malpractice requirements, while economic, support the patients'
welfare by allowing doctors to treat seriously ill patients without the fear of
personal liability); Dattilo v. Tuscon Gen. Hosp., 533 P.2d 700, 704 (Ariz.
1975) (stating that exclusive contracts enhance the quality of care by improving
scheduling).




n127  Mark A. Kadzielski et al., Peer Review Potpourri: New Developments in
Credentialing and Priviliging, 15 WHITTIER L. REV. 51, 58-59 (1994). Antitrust
may also be an issue when dealing with closed and exclusive contracts. See
Jefferson Parish Hosp. v. Hyde 466 U.S. 2, 5 (1984) (finding that the hospital's
exclusive anesthesiology contract is not a per se violation of the Sherman
Antitrust Act).




n128  See, e.g., Redding v. St. Francis Med. Ctr., 255 Cal. Rptr. 806, 810 (Cal.
Ct. App. 1989) (supporting St. Francis' decision to move from an open system to
a closed system in order to improve its bypass surgery mortality rate);
Radiology Prof. Corp. v. Trinidad Area Health Ass'n, Inc., 577 P.2d 748, 752
(Colo. 1978) (allowing hospital administrators to enter into exclusive contracts
in certain situations); Dattilo, 533 P.2d at 704 ("Such [exclusive] contracts
[are] needed for control and standardization of procedure and effective,
efficient operation of the department.").




n129  533 P.2d at 704.




n130  255 Cal. Rptr. at 810.




n131  See Doctors Sue to Fight Economic Credentialing, MED. & HEALTH, Oct. 3,
1994.

     The American College of Radiology has adopted the position that state
     legislatures should bar economic credentialing and has defined that
     term broadly enough to include such practices as signing contracts
     with a single radiology group . . . . The Florida Medical Association
     last year introduced a bill in the state legislature that would have
     mandated that quality of patient care be the prime objective in
     evaluating any proposal to close a hospital department or to contract
     with an outside service. The bill would have banned any restriction on
     staff privileges made for economic reasons.

Id.




n132  See discussion infra part IV.C. In Maine, the Supreme Judicial Court
upheld the Eastern Maine Medical Center's termination of its emergency medical
contract with a physician group.  Bartley v. Eastern Maine Med. Ctr., 617 A.2d
1020, 1021 (Me. 1992). The court acknowledged that the hospital was attempting
to cut costs as the result of state legislation limiting gross revenues realized
by hospitals.  Id. at 1021 n.2 (citing 22 M.R.S.A. §§ 381, 396 (1992)).




n133  Blum, supra note 79, at 594.




n134  465 N.E.2d 554, 560 (Ill. 1984), cert. denied, 493 U.S. 847 (1989); see
also Rao v. St. Elizabeth's Hosp., 488 N.E.2d 685 (Ill. 1986) (overutilizing
laboratory tests); Friedman v. Delaware County Mem. Hosp., 672 F. Supp. 171
(E.D. Pa. 1987), aff'd, 849 F.2d 600 (3d Cir. 1988) (overutilizing bronchoscopes
and refusing to abide by recommendations made by the utilization review
committee).




n135  Knapp, 465 N.E.2d at 559-60.




n136  Id. at 560.




n137  Id.




n138  See Blum, supra note 79, at 594-95.




n139  672 F. Supp. at 183.




n140  Id.




n141  See Blum, supra note 79, at 595-96.




n142  See Blum, supra note 16, at 449 (citing Edelman v. JFK Hosp., No.
C-2104-80 (N.J. Super. Ct. 1982), cert. denied, 475 A.2d 585 (N.J. 1984)).




n143  See Blum, supra note 16, at 449.




n144  See Blum, supra note 16, at 449.




n145  See Blum, supra note 16, at 449.




n146  See discussion supra parts II.B.2-3 and statutes cited supra note 40.




n147  See, e.g., Desai v. St. Barnabas Med. Ctr., 510 A.2d 662, 668 (N.J. 1986)
(stating that hospitals must reasonably use their powers for the public good);
Redding v. St. Francis Med. Ctr., 255 Cal. Rptr. 806, 810 (Cal. Ct. App. 1989)
(stating hospitals can further patient care even if detrimental to the
provider); Davidson v. Youngstown Hosp. Ass'n, 250 N.E.2d 892, 895 (Ohio 1969)
(stating that credentialing must also be reasonable and promote the public
good).




n148  106 Wash. 2d 632, 648, 724 P.2d 981, 990 (1986).




n149  Id. at 643, 645, 724 P.2d at 987, 989 (providing that the action taken
against the physician is not arbitrary or capricious).




n150  Id. at 648, 724 P.2d at 990.




n151  510 A.2d 662, 664 (N.J. 1986). The admission criteria for procuring staff
privileges under the closed-staff policy were:

     (1) a need for additional physician coverage in the relevant
     department,
     (2) available hospital facilities,
     (3) the applicant possessed some special expertise or
     (4) engaged in a specialty not represented at the hospital,
     (5) the applicant did not have privileges at any other area hospital
     and
     (6) was joining the medical practice of a current member of the
     hospital medical staff.

 Id. at 664 n.1.

   The court found the practice of making exceptions to the hospital's
closed-staff policy for physicians who had connections with existing staff was
not supported by a public-health objective and thus ruled for the plaintiff.
Id. at 672.




n152  Id. at 665-68.

   Since 1961 the court has declared "matters affecting public health [have]
been recognized as a significant criterion by which to measure the
reasonableness of institutional health-care decisions." Id. at 665 (citing
Falcone v. Middlesex County Med. Soc'y, 170 A.2d 791 (N.J. 1961)).

   In 1963, the court struck down the criterion that a physician graduate from
an A.M.A. approved school belong to the local medical society. The reason for
invalidating the criteria was that it served no public purpose. The "powers
exercised in the selection of the hospital medical staff 'are deeply imbedded in
public aspects, and are rightly viewed . . . as fiduciary powers to be exercised
reasonably and for the public good.'" Id. at 666 (quoting Greisman v. Newcomb
Hosp., 192 A.2d 817 (N.J. 1963)) (emphasis added).

   "'[A] hospital has a right and a duty not only to review the qualifications
of doctors, but also to consider the need for and impact of additional doctors
on the hospital's staff and patients.'" Id. (quoting Belmar v. Cipolla, 475 A.2d
533 (N.J. 1984)).

   The Desai court also supported its understanding of public policy with New
Jersey statutory law: "hospital[s] and related health care services of the
highest quality, of demonstrated need, efficiently provided and properly
utilized at a reasonable cost are of vital concern to the public health." Id.
(citation omitted) (emphasis added).




n153  Id. at 668 (emphasis added).




n154  See discussion supra part II.B.2 and statutes cited supra note 40; see
also N.J. STAT. ANN. § 26:2H-1 - 52 (West 1993) (providing efficient, quality
hospitals are of vital concern to the public health).




n155  Rosenblum v. Tallahassee Mem. Reg. Med. Ctr., No. 91-589 (D. Fla. 1992).




n156  Hudson, supra note 13.




n157  Hudson, supra note 13.




n158  Hudson, supra note 13.




n159  Hudson, supra note 13.




n160  Hudson, supra note 13.




n161  See Hudson, supra note 13. See also FLA. STAT. ANN. § 395.0191(4) (West
1993).




n162  See statutes supra note 40. See also public policy discussion supra notes
152-54 and accompanying text.




n163  See discussion supra part II.B.3.




n164  The argument can be made that overutilizing resources also affects the
quality of care. Taking into consideration that hospitals have limited
resources, the allocation of such resources becomes critical. Hypothetically,
patients of overutilizing physicians receive a disproportionate share of limited
resources. This unequal allocation of limited resources is to the detriment of
the remaining patients.




n165  The corporate medicine doctrine has origins in both statutory and common
law. See Francis J. Serbaroli, Corporate Practice of Medicine: A Clear and
Present Danger, THE HEALTH LAW., Spring 1994, at 6, 6.




n166  15 U.S.C. §§ 1-7 (1988) [hereinafter Sherman Act].

     Section 1 provides: "Every contract, combination in the form of trust
     or otherwise, or conspiracy, in restraint of trade or commerce among
     the several States, or with foreign nations, is hereby declared to be
     illegal. . . ." Id. § 1. Section 2 deals with monopolies. Id. § 2.






n167  15 U.S.C. § 14 (1988) (prohibiting, among others, exclusive dealing
arrangements and tying agreements that lessen competition).




n168  15 U.S.C. § 45 (1988) (enforcing the prohibition of unfair methods of
competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices).




n169  15 U.S.C. § 1 (1988).




n170  Northwest Wholesale Stationers, Inc., v. Pacific Stationery & Printing
Co., 472 U.S. 284, 289-90 (1985) (citations omitted); Seagood Trading Corp. v.
Jerrico, Inc., 924 F.2d 1555, 1569 (11th Cir. 1991). See also Blum, supra note
16, at 451-56 (providing a detailed discussion of antitrust implications on
economic credentialing); Jackson & Levy, supra note 113, § V (providing a
detailed analysis of antitrust issues under various delivery systems, and the
joint FTC-DOJ 1993 Policy Statement designed to reform antitrust laws pertaining
to the health care arena).




n171  Seagood, 924 F.2d at 1569.




n172  Id. at 1567-70.




n173  See Jefferson Parish Hosp. v. Hyde, 466 U.S. 2 (1984) (ruling that
exclusive contracts or closed departments are not per se violations of
antitrust). Cf. Bolt v. Halifax Hosp. Med. Ctr., 891 F.2d 810 (11th Cir. 1990)
(touching on per se violation by stating that an adverse decision regarding
privileges are presumed economically motivated and evidence of an economic
conspiracy); Weiss v. York Hosp., 745 F.2d 786 (3d Cir. 1984) (finding a group
boycott for refusing privileges to a physician, and thus a per se violation).




n174  Virginia Academy of Clinical Psychol. v. Blue Shield of Virginia, 624 F.2d
476 (4th Cir. 1980), cert. denied, 450 U.S. 916 (1981).




n175  Jackson & Levy, supra note 113, at § V.B.8.




n176  See Blum, supra note 16, at 456.




n177  See Blum, supra note 79, at 590 (citing Hassan v. Independent Practice
Assoc., 698 F. Supp. 6679 (E.D. Mich. 1988)).




n178  See Taber & King, supra note 19, at 1196.




n179  California Retail Liquor Dealers Ass'n v. Midcal Aluminum, Inc., 445 U.S.
97, 97 (1980).




n180  Arizona v. Maricopa County Med. Soc'y, 457 U.S. 332, 340 (1982).




n181  Id. at 356.




n182  42 U.S.C. §§ 11101-11152 (1988).




n183  Id. § 11112(a)(1) (emphasis added).




n184  Id. § 11112(a)(4).




n185  731 F. Supp. 934, 939 (C.D. Cal. 1990), aff'd, 979 F.2d 728 (9th Cir.
1992).




n186  See Hudson, supra note 13, 13.




n187  See Blum, supra note 79, at 589 (citing ILL. ANN. STAT. ch. 111 1/2 P151.2
(Smith-Hurd 1988)).




n188  42 U.S.C. §§ 1320a-7b(b) (1988) (The Department of Justice may impose
fines of up to $ 25,000 and five years imprisonment for violations.).




n189  Jackson & Levy, supra note 113, § IV.A.




n190  42 C.F.R. § 1001.952 (1994) (establishing safe harbor regulations).




n191  Serbaroli, supra note 165, at 6-7.




n192  Serbaroli, supra note 165, at 7.




n193  See, e.g., KY. REV. STAT. ANN. §§ 311.375, 313.020 (Michie/Bobbs-Merrill
1993); UTAH CODE ANN. §§ 16-11-3, 16-11-4, 58-12-30 (1993).




n194  See, e.g., Standard Optical Co. v. Superior Court, 17 Wash. 2d 323, 334,
135 P.2d 839, 844 (1943) (stating that neither corporations or unlicensed
persons can practice medicine).

   In Washington state "no statute prohibits hospitals from employing
physicians," and the doctrine is based only upon case law. Cynthia F. Strauss,
Physician/Hospital Employment and the Corporate Practice of Medicine, HEALTH L.
NEWS, Jan. 1994, at 1 (providing a status report on the corporate practice of
medicine doctrine in Washington). The judiciary virtually ignores the doctrine
concerning hospital employment of physicians. Id.




n195  See Sager v. Lewin, 106 S.W. 581, 583 (Mo. Ct. App. 1907); State
Electro-Medical Inst. v. State, 103 N.W. 1078, 1079 (Neb. 1905).




n196  Hall, supra note 6, at 509-10.




n197  Hall, supra note 6, at 517.




n198  H.R. 3600, 103d Cong., 1st Sess. § 1407(b) (1993) (providing that "any
state law related to the corporate practice of medicine . . . shall not apply to
arrangements between health plans that are not fee-for-service plans and their
participating providers . . . .").




n199  See discussion infra part VI.A.




n200  See Hall, supra note 6, at 462-66.




n201  KEETON ET AL., supra note 67, § 129, at 978-79.




n202  See, e.g., Posner v. Lankenau Hosp., 645 F. Supp. 1102, 1111-15 (E.D. Pa.
1986); Scheller v. American Med. Int'l, 502 So. 2d 1268, 1271-72 (Fla. Dist. Ct.
App. 1987); Straube v. Larson, 600 P.2d 371, 374 (Or. 1979).




n203  The courts are supportive of a physician's autonomy in practicing
medicine. See generally Hall, supra note 6 (detailing the history of the
physician's autonomy to practice medicine and current threats to such autonomy).




n204  Hall, supra note 6, at 475.




n205  Lawler v. Eugene Wuesthoff Mem. Hosp. Ass'n, 497 So. 2d 1261, 1263 (Fla.
Dist. Ct. App. 1986).




n206  See Butler, supra note 2, at 864-65 (describing the applicability of
critical pathways); see also Benell v. City of Virginia, 104 N.W.2d 633, 637
(Minn. 1960) (sustaining a hospital resolution requiring a radiology
consultation because it left the ultimate decision with the physician).




n207  Hall, supra note 6, at 472-74.




n208  See Redding, 255 Cal. Rptr. at 809 (finding that courts often rule for
hospitals where the hospital is acting for "less personally directed reasons
[public interest]").




n209  Hall, supra note 6, at 474.




n210  Hall, supra note 6, at 474.




n211  Similar to antitrust actions, the main issue here is the size of the
institution and the respective impact the denial of privileges has on the
physician's practice. See discussion supra part V.A.1.




n212  U.S. CONST. amend. XIV, § 1.




n213  Christhilf v. Annapolis Emergency Hosp. Ass'n, Inc., 552 F.2d 1070, 1073
(4th Cir. 1977) (holding the lack of a hearing violated plaintiff's due process
rights).




n214  See Taber & King, supra note 19, at 1195.




n215  See Taber & King, supra note 19, at 1195-96. Federal funds, such as
Medicare and Medicaid, that are accepted by private institutions may arguably
create government involvement sufficient for state action. However, "courts are
extremely reticent to find state action based solely upon . . . receipt of
government funds." Taber & King, supra note 19, at 1196.




n216  See, e.g., Knapp v. Palos Community Hosp., 465 N.E.2d 554, 557 (Ill.
1984), cert. denied, 493 U.S. 847 (1989) (finding that a decision not to
reappoint physicians did not violate the hospital's bylaws and thus is not
subject to judicial review).




n217 " Notice and opportunity to be heard are fundamental to due process of
law." Joint Anti-Fascist Refugee Comm. v. McGrath, 341 U.S. 123, 178 (1951).




n218  See 42 U.S.C. §§ 111101-111152 (1988).




n219  See Milton L. Cruz, The Duty of Fair Procedure and the Hospital Medical
Staff: Possible Extension in Order to Protect Private Sector Employees, 16 CAP.
U. L. REV. 59, 79-85 (1986).




n220  Most successful antitrust challenges to adverse credentialing decisions
involving economic considerations result from arbitrary or retaliatory
decisions. See Andrew K. Dolan & Richard S. Ralston, Hospital Admitting
Privileges and the Sherman Act, 18 HOUS. L. REV. 707, 734 (1981).




n221  Ways Exist to Overcome Pesky State AWP Laws, MANAGED CARE WK., Mar. 20,
1995 [hereinafter Pesky AWP Laws]. See also AWP Laws, supra note 98.

   "The legal language the Florida Medical Association . . . and doctors across
the country . . . are looking for is 'any willing provider.' . . . It's the
toughest political language we have tried to get, but its significance is
absolutely enormous." Beall, supra note 66, at 21-22 (citation omitted).




n222  See Pesky AWP Laws, supra note 221.




n223  Christina Kent, Any Willing Provider Battles Heat Up in States, MEDICINE &
HEALTH (PERSPECTIVES), May 2, 1994.




n224  See, e.g., OKLA. STAT. ANN. tit., 36 § 6055(c)(2)(a-c) (West 1994)
(granting compliance with the patient's freedom of choice requirement under § 36
6055(A)). The statute provides: "Any statewide provider network which . . .
allows any hospital or practitioner . . . to become a network provider if said
hospital or practitioner is willing to comply with the terms and conditions of a
standard network provider contract." Id.




n225  See definition of managed care supra note 105.




n226  See, e.g., KY. REV. STAT. ANN. § 304.17A-110(3) (Michie/Bobbs-Merrill
1994) (effective July 1995). The statute provides: "Health care benefit plans
shall not discriminate against any provider who is located within the geographic
coverage area of the health benefit plan and is willing to meet the terms and
conditions for participation established by the health benefit plan." Id.




n227  See Pesky AWP Laws, supra note 221 (quoting Robert Quirk, president of the
HMO Association of Kentucky).




n228  See, e.g., NEV. REV. STAT. § 616.2212 (1995). The statute provides in
part:

     Organizations for managed care: Required provisions in contract and
     plan for provision of services. The manager shall not enter into a
     contract with an organization for managed care unless:
     . . .
     The organization's proposed plan for providing medical and health care
     services:
     . . .
     Does not exclude from participation in the proposed plan any category
     of providers of health care who are required to be licensed or
     certified to practice in this state and willing to comply with the
     terms and conditions required by the organization to participate in
     the proposed plan . . . .

Id. (emphasis added).




n229  Pesky AWP Laws, supra note 221 (asserting that proper economic criteria
still effectively exclude certain providers). "The easiest way to avoid the
impact of any willing provider is to have good and clear credentialing criteria
for provider contracts." Pesky AWP Laws, supra note 221.




n230  Any Willing Provider Battles Heat Up in States, MEDICINE & HEALTH, May 2,
1994 (citing Florida's Governor Chiles as declaring he would veto AWP laws
because they would sabotage efforts to reduce health care costs).




n231  Id.




n232  See Pesky AWP Laws, supra note 221.




n233  See discussion supra notes 227-29 and accompanying text.




n234  Medical Soc'y of D.C. v. Blue Cross Blue Shield of the Nat'l Capital Area,
No. 1:94CV01426 (D.D.C. June 28, 1994). Pro/File is a computer data system that
tracks a physician's utilization history; the system may drop overutilizers from
the plan. Under Pro/File, more than 100 doctors lost their contracts by the end
of 1991. MANAGED CARE L. OUTLOOK, supra note 93.




n235  See Kent, supra note 223.




n236  See Blum, supra note 16, at 431-32.




n237  42 C.F.R. § 482.12 (1994) (stating requirements that must be met in order
to qualify for Medicare and Medicaid reimbursement).




n238  See JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21.




n239  42 C.F.R. § 482.12 (1994) provides in part:

     The hospital must have an effective governing body legally responsible
     for the conduct of the hospital as an institution.
     . . .
     (a) Standard: Medical Staff. The governing body must:
     (1) Determine, in accordance with State law, which categories of
     practitioners are eligible candidates for appointment to the medical
     staff;
     (2) Appoint members of the medical staff after considering the
     recommendations of the existing members of the medical staff;
     (3) Assure that the medical staff has bylaws;
     (4) Approve medical staff bylaws and other medical staff rules and
     regulations;
     (5) Ensure that the medical staff is accountable to the governing body
     for the quality of care provided to patients;
     (6) Ensure the criteria for selection are individual character,
     competence, training, experience, and judgment;
     . . .
     (b) Standard: Chief executive officer. The governing body must appoint
     a chief executive officer who is responsible for managing the
     hospital.
     . . .
     (d) Standard: Institutional plan and budget. The institution must have
     an overall institutional plan . . . .
     . . .
     (e) Standard: Contracted services.
     . . .
     (1) The governing body must ensure that the services performed under a
     contract are provided in a safe and effective manner.

Id. (emphasis added).




n240  Id. § 482.22 provides in part:

     Condition of Participation: Medical Staff.
     The hospital must have an organized medical staff that operates under
     bylaws approved by the governing body and is responsible for the
     quality of medical care provided to patients by the hospital.
     . . .
     (a)(1) The medical staff must periodically conduct appraisals of its
     members.
     (a)(2) The medical staff must examine credentials of candidates for
     medical staff membership and make recommendations to the governing
     body on the appointment of the candidates.
     . . .
     (c)(4) Describe the qualifications to be met by a candidate in order
     for the medical staff to recommend that the candidate be appointed by
     the governing body.
     . . .
     (c)(6) Include criteria for determining the privileges to be granted
     to individual practitioners and a procedure for applying the criteria
     to individuals requesting privileges.

Id. (emphasis added).




n241  See JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21, § 3.




n242  See generally Hudson, supra note 13 (discussing economic credentialing
under Florida law after recent judicial decisions).




n243  JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21, § 3.1.




n244  See, e.g., JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21, § 3 (Governing Board); 42 C.F.R. §
482.12 (1994) provided in part, supra note 239. See also Blum, supra note 79, at
588-89.




n245  See Blum, supra note 79, at 588.




n246  See JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21, § 3; 42 C.F.R. § 482.12 provided in part,
supra note 239.




n247  One problem with this approach is that credentialing decisions not
connected with furthering the quality of care will not receive immunity under
most statutes.




n248  Johnson v. Misericordia Community Hosp., 301 N.W.2d 156, 174 (Wis. 1981)
(stating that while credentialing is a function of the medical staff, it is also
a corporate responsibility of the hospital).




n249  See statutes cited supra note 40.




n250  One well known program, known as the Harford Hospital experiment,
evaluates physician efficiency on length of stay, charges, malpractice
experience, and utilization. Leonard E. Cantrell, Jr. et al., Physician
Efficiency and Reimbursement: A Case Study, HOSP. & HEALTH SERV. ADMIN. 43
(1986). Evaluations are compared to objective data compiled by the Maryland
Health Services Cost Review Commission. Id. at 45. Physicians falling outside of
the expected standards are given counseling as an opportunity to change their
undesired practices. Id. at 46-47. Privileges are denied or reduced only after a
series of due process type procedures fail to correct the deficiency. Id. at
45-48.




n251  See discussion supra part III.D.




n252  Jackson & Levy, supra note 113, § II.C.




n253  See, e.g., WASH. REV. CODE §§ 48.05.010 - .410 (1995) (Insurers - General
Requirements).




n254  Jackson & Levy, supra note 113, § II.C.4; see discussion supra, part
V.B.1.




n255  See, e.g., WASH. REV. CODE §§ 70.47.005-.901 (1995) (providing basic
health coverage to an otherwise medically indigent population through a state
administered managed care network).




n256  See generally AN INCONSISTENT PICTURE, supra note 3 (identifying numerous
federal activities and programs designed after managed care in order to reduce
costs); Lombardo, supra note 61.




n257  See discussion supra part VI.A.




n258  State medical practice and licensure statutes are similar to JCAHO
requirements. See discussion supra part II.B. and accompanying footnotes.




n259  See 42 U.S.C. §§ 11101-11152 (1988); see, e.g., WASH. REV. CODE §
43.70.510 (1995).




n260  See SNOOK, supra note 19, at 204.




n261  211 N.E.2d 253, 257-58 (Ill. 1965), cert. denied, 383 U.S. 946 (1966).




n262  See generally William M. Sage & James M. Jorling, A World that Won't Stand
Still: Enterprise Liability By Private Contract, 43 DEPAUL L. REV. 1007 (1994)
(analyzing the advantages and disadvantages of the impending enterprise
liability theory). The incorporation of organizational practice guidelines that
providers must follow is one example of institutional involvement in the
practice of medicine. Id.




n263  Darling, 211 N.E.2d 253.




n264  See Health Care Reform Update, MANAGED CARE L. OUTLOOK, June 22, 1993
(Enterprise liability requires health plans to accept full responsibility for
affiliated physicians' actions.).




n265  Sage & Jorling, supra note 262, at 1008 n.4.




n266  Sage & Jorling, supra note 262, at 1008 n.5.




n267  Sage & Jorling, supra note 262, at 1039 (citing Fox v. Health Net, No.
219692 (Cal. Sup. Ct., Dec. 28, 1993)).




n268  Sage & Jorling, supra note 262, at 1009-10.




n269  Sage & Jorling, supra note 262, at 1010.




n270  See discussion supra part II.D.




n271  See discussion supra parts III.D.-F.




n272  These are responsibilities for which the governing board is statutorily
responsible under HCFA, and also under JCAHO guidelines. See also 42 C.F.R. §
482.12 (1995); JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21, § 3.




n273  Economic credentialing is arguably tied to the quality of care through
efficient and effective allocation of resources.




n274  JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 21, § 3.3.2 (requiring fair-hearing and appellate
review mechanisms).




n275  See discussion supra part V.B.4 (reviewing any willing provider laws).




n276  NEV. REV. STAT. § 616.2212 (1995).




n277  See discussion supra part V.B.3.a.




n278  See discussion supra part V.B.3.




n279  See discussion supra part II.B.3.




n280  See surveys cited supra note 13.




n281  See discussion supra part II.B.2.




n282  See statutes cited supra note 40.




n283  See discussion supra part IV.C. and accompanying footnotes.




n284  See VEATCH, supra note 14, at 158.


